
Blood Born
A story of the supernatural
By Jodie Rose
First printing September 2018
Copyright © Jodie Rose All rights reserved
10  8  7  6  5  4  3  2  1
Facebook.com/jodieroseauthor
jodieroseauthor.wordpress.com
Cover design: https://jodieszarmachphoto.wixsite.com/images
Castle image: Photo by Rob Jackson on Unsplash
Texture image: Federico-Gutierre at Unsplash


DISCLAIMER
The book as well as the characters in this book are entirely fictional. Any resemblance to actual persons living or dead is entirely coincidental.

License Notes
This book is licensed for your personal enjoyment only.  This book may not be re-sold or given away to other people.  If you would like to share this book with another person, please purchase an additional copy for each recipient.  If you’re reading this book and did not purchase it, or it was not purchased for your enjoyment only, then please return to Smashwords.com or your favorite retailer and purchase your own copy.  Thank you for respecting the hard work of this author.
Table of Contents:



Dedications and acknowledgements
Chapter One
Chapter Two
Chapter Three
Chapter Four
Chapter Five
Chapter Six
Chapter Seven
Chapter Eight
Chapter Nine
Chapter Ten
Chapter Eleven
Chapter Twelve
Chapter Thirteen
Chapter Fourteen
Chapter Fifteen
Chapter Sixteen
Chapter Seventeen
Chapter Eighteen
Other Books by This Author
About the Author
Contact the Author

Dedications & Acknowledgements

Dedicated to those who helped inspire the characters and those who have supported us from the beginning of this journey. The continued support from our friends, family, and readers is more appreciated than you will ever know. We cannot believe this is the final book to this series but we are so excited to start the next adventure. We hope to see you there! 

Special recognition:
Our wonderful editor, Anne – Marie Brock and Angela Utter thank you both for the time you put into both editing and beta reading for us.
Cover Design:

Chapter One



Scarlett sat on the bar stool, leaning back into the hard wood as she glanced at the shot glass in her hand.
Vodka was her vice, one she had to be careful with.
She had a terrible tendency to overdo it, to drink until Gordon had to slug her off to whatever foreign hotel they were staying in. But Scarlett was seeking adventure. She wanted to see the world despite her parents’ wishes.
Millie, Jax, and Julian were fully against her traveling and bouncing from country to country. Had she stayed with the clan, it would have been easy to protect her, to keep a watchful eye on her at all times. While she was traveling, it was much harder to ensure the Scots kept their dirty hands off her.
It was part of the reason they hired Gordon.
Gordon was six foot, seven inches high, almost four hundred pounds. And also one of the last remaining pure-blooded werebears. Alex had been the hookup on that connection and they were thankful for it. With more and more mixed breeds taking over, the strongest and purest of bloodlines were dying off.
Scarlett had honed in on her magic at an early age, starting so much younger than most and excelling in even the most advanced spells by the time she was sixteen. They chalked it up to the royal blood, it had to be, especially with mixed blooded supernaturals normally having the shorter end of the strength stick.
She was a force to be reckoned with. Anything from healing, to fighting, to wards, to moving things with a flick of her finger, she was a master. It helped her family come to terms with her leaving the safety of home.
Of course, she was going to do it with or without their permission.
She had the itch to leave at eighteen, stayed until she was twenty-one, but after that? She was gone. She needed, wanted, to see the world and experience it firsthand. Not even the traumatic kidnapping from her childhood could cease the wanderlust that took over Scarlett’s mind.
Currently, they were staying in Bali and renting out a little shack on the beach. It was one of her favorite places next to Thailand. Which meant it was Gordon’s least favorite. He always did seem to find a way to hate everything Scarlett loved the most. An even better reason to have him as a guard, her father Jax had told her.
The bear bitched and complained. It was too hot, the air too salty, no woods. Blah, blah, blah. Scarlett didn’t care. Her job wasn’t to please him with where she chose to go to next. It was his job to sit down, shut up, and watch her back. A glorified babysitter. One that was just starting to grow on her despite the constant nagging.
Throwing back the vodka in her hand, Scarlett swallowed the liquid and flagged the bartender down for another. The guy’s name was Jason, he was only working the bar for the summer and then he was headed back to the states. Nice enough dude, one she had tasted on more than one occasion. A charming human who never did run out of tasteful jokes and stories that made even Scarlett blush.
“Two more please, then I’m done for the night.”

~

Brodie kept his distance, despite being convinced that guard of hers wouldn’t recognize his scent. Why would he? This was the closest the hired hand had been to the infamous Scarlett Castilda. Although the last name was a borrow from her dear adoptive mother, not at all as elegant as her family’s calling. MacAlpin. Her blood had been some of the first to rule Scotland, a family that secretly ruled the vampires, still.
Even if the humans had merged their political group with England, there was only one family that watched over the supernaturals. A family whose hands dipped deep into the control of those lands, manipulating the humans and ensuring their ways were kept. Part of that? Making sure that mixed blood child of shame was put to rest before she ever came for the throne. Scarlett was the rightful heir to the Scottish vampire clan. One they had been trying to get their hands on for quite some time. Always escaping, always protected.
Now? The young woman was exploring bravely. No clue one the deadliest vampires in Scotland had been put on her case several years prior.
Brodie had followed Scarlett very closely. Learned all about her family, her security, what she liked to drink, do, read. Anything he needed to get to the end of his mission. The moment he brought Scarlett back, they could do whatever it was they needed with her. It wasn’t a part of the job to care about the target or question intentions. Only to deliver them to the buyer when the time was right.
He was still baffled by the fact they allowed her to live. In the end they wanted her dead, right? So why go through all the effort of bringing her in? Of hiring the High Moon Gang back in their hayday? Still, it wasn’t his position to question his employers. Just to bring her in...as unscathed as possible. The bear? He had to be dealt with to ensure her protection back home didn’t catch wind of things. At the very least Brodie needed to make sure Gordon was occupied for enough time to drag Scarlett back to Scotland.
What better place to finally strike than the one with which he was most familiar? Brodie had spent almost a decade in Bali several years back, using the throngs of people to hide from those back in Scotland who were, at the time, after his head. It seemed someone was offering a lot of money to get rid of Brodie. The bounty hunters had been hired by his ex-wife, a bloodthirsty and possessive woman he had been happy to run from. Going to Bali seemed like a great choice at the time. There really was no other way to get away from the bitch.
Completely evil. So why did he want to get this capture to rub it in her face? They were both hunters for the King now, but it was clear that Brodie was superior. His ex had been forced to drop the bounties on his head the moment she was employed by the King.
It really was a good thing she hadn’t been forced to be partnered with him, Victoria would not have lasted a moment in Bali. She was a deadly killer but the humidity would have ‘destroyed her hair’. He distinctly remembered her complaining about blood in it at least a half dozen times during their time together. Blood always seemed to spill where the two of them wandered.
Pulling back his beer, Brodie sucked on the leftover piece of ice in his mouth. Ice in beer. It was not something he would have enjoyed before but due to that heat, it was a norm around there. He spoke fluent Indonesian but knew for a fact Scarlett did not. That was fine, he had over eighty years on the young mixed blood royal. It meant that she had no way to get close with the locals around there, depending on relationships with travelers. She had no close friends that were watching her back, so it was far too easy to convince the bartender to slip a little gift into hers and Gordon’s drinks. It wouldn’t knock either of them out but it would help make Scarlett more susceptible to Brodie and hopefully keep Gordon off his A game. The drinks had already been delivered. It was almost time to strike.
Dark eyes fell on Scarlett. It was always odd...seeing his targets up close and personal for the first time. She had been an enigma of a project for Brodie, a unique, talented magic user. No matter how much magic disgusted Brodie, she knew enough to force his respect. It was hard to look down on someone when they were a master of their craft. There was just something about the way those dim lights shone down on Scarlett. Almost as if she radiated magic along with her own classic beauty. It was quite different than watching her from afar...nothing like photos.
He would not underestimate his target, or her bodyguard. No matter how certain he was that she’d be on her way to Scotland in the morn.
Time to choke back that accent and play the part of traveling tourist.
He grabbed for another glass of iced beer, leaving his place at the counter and walking towards the back exit. The door was open, a porch seen through the glassless windows in front of him. Flickers of lights from cigarettes and cigars out in the warm night air.
Brodie pretended to head towards the door when he stopped, glancing over at her. From that distance she was certain to pick up on the fact he wasn’t human. The best part about Bali? Not a lot of supernaturals. He’d stick out like a sore thumb. For this moment that was key but after he nabbed her, Bali would not be in the cards for him, again. Of course, that meant he would stick out for her little bear as well. It was something he had taken into consideration and planned for. If Brodie was a betting man, he’d put money on Scarlett still being able to get away and take note of his scent before the werebear. The guard was sitting in the corner, keeping Scarlett at the corner of his eye while he argued wrestling with one of the patrons. Gordon was a lot of things, but even with his lumbering frame he could still blend in with a crowd.
Stay put, cub. It was time for Brodie to play.

~

Scarlett was reaching for the glass in front of her when her body froze, hair on the back of her neck prickling. Another supernatural, of that she was certain. It was like a gentle breeze in the air that brought her to full alert. Her eyes landed on Gordon for a moment, relieved that he didn’t seem to notice what she did. Snatching the tiny shot glass, she shifted in her seat. Deep brown eyes searched the area and landing on the man a few feet away.
He was tall, easily beating her by a solid foot, if not more, definitely outweighed her. The man was positively gorgeous and she hardly had to take a moment to notice it. What struck her as odd? The tattoo of the a Celtic knot on his forearm. It was hidden amongst other splashes and designs of ink but it was the meaning behind it...where the Celtic knot had come from. Scarlett frowned, eyes traveling up to his face. His hair was short, cut like a warriors, but her blood ran cold when she got to his dark eyes.
There was just...something about them that kept her captivated. And that scar on his cheek? The hoop in his left ear? He was like a damn pirate nestled away at the dive bar. One she wanted to get her hands on.
Scarlett hammered down the shot and grabbed the second glass she had requested before slipping off the stool and heading toward the male. Her skin prickled, a gentle caress of her magic the first defense she relied on. When she passed him, she paused, glancing up at him with a quirked brow, offering no words. A shrug followed a moment later and she moved by him, heading out to the back deck ahead of him.
Brodie followed her, stopping at the door to the back porch as two men headed inside. Good, it was already starting to clear up outside. He only had a small bit of time to get the ball rolling, and by now Gordon should have been feeling the effects of Brodie’s little treat. It would have muffled his reflexes and ability to sense Brodie out, not to mention keep his eyes on Scarlett as she disappeared to the back.
One heavily ringed hand fell into the pocket of his shorts, bringing out a cigar and placing it between his lips. Lighting it, Brodie caught sight of Scarlett standing near the wooden side of the porch and headed over towards her.
He stopped a few feet away, taking a puff before glancing over at her with dark eyes. Scarlett was stunning, that much was certain. With that long dark hair and those piercing brown eyes of hers. Petite frame...the magic dancing along her skin. It was both alluring and alarming to the vampire.
“I didn’t think there was another supernatural around here!” He said, breaking the silence. That perfected American accent erasing all traces of his Scottish droll. “Nick, pleasure to meet you.” He thrusted out a ringed hand.
“I was the only one I knew of until you showed up.” Scarlett responded slowly.
She had no interest in providing him with her name. Not yet. Her eyes flashed down to the extended hand, ignoring it. “Pleasure.” She said, offering nothing else.
His hand dropped lazily, the smallest of twitches at the edge of his mouth. She could not quite place if he was irritated or humored by her lack of friendliness.
Leaning back against the wood rail, she crossed her arms over her chest. “What brings you to Bali? Spring break?” She asked, eyebrow quirking up.
“Yep spring break. Sorry to bother you.” He put both his hands up and frowned. “Just nice to see another one of my kind but clearly you’re not interested in a friendly hello.”
He knew her character well enough from his studies. No matter how hard-headed and like her adoptive mother Scarlett was, there was a softness there. One that had to come from her birth mother. Perhaps it had been what swayed her father to betray his throne and their kind for the woman who was not a vampire.
He turned then, pretending to leave once more. But in his head, Brodie continued that countdown before she asked him to stay. Knowing it would come. He was always right, after all. No matter how surprising he had found Scarlett to be during his studies. Three...Two...
Scarlett’s jaw clenched, teeth grinding when the male started to walk away from her. She should have had a strong backbone, should have listened to the alarm bells and let him keep walking. But she didn’t.
With a sigh, she pushed off the railing and started after him. “Wait.” Reaching out, her hand grabbed for his wrist to stop him before he could get much further.
“Scarlett. My name is Scarlett.”
He had a small smile on his lips before she grabbed onto him, knowing she was coming. Knowing he had been right. But the moment that contact was made, Brodie’s teeth gritted together and his body froze. He could feel her magic like a pulse through him, a caressing presence that had not been there before. One that was both immediately arousing and triggered his own defensive measures; fangs aching to release as he hardened at her contact, entire body fighting against the reaction she was invoking in him. It was only a matter of time before she felt the full effects of her drink and the power he felt was a mere buzz on his skin. For a moment he hated the thought of such power being harnessed.
But Brodie shoved it all down and when he turned towards her, it was with a warm smile. “It’s really nice to meet you, Scarlett.”
Oh it was, it really was.
When Brodie had turned towards her, something slipped into his hand, too fast for Scarlett to catch. The vampire was as quick as a whip, easily able to manipulate the drug into her drink as they turned and moved back towards the side of the porch. It would dissolve before she even had a chance to see it. The second dose would be the double tap Brodie needed.
She was too strong to be taken out by the flunitrazepam but it would weaken her magic and leave her susceptible to his vampire compulsion. A neat little trick of the vampires that allowed them to penetrate the mind of those weaker than themselves. Jedi mind tricks, his ex had once called them. Either way, Scarlett would be his puppet shortly.
“What brings you here? I’ve only been around for a few days but I was sure I’d seen all the main local spots. I would have remembered you.”
“Vacation.” She said simply, taking the shot of vodka in her hand. “I want to see the world.” She quietly added. “How about you? What brings you to this part of the world? Odd spot for a supernatural to be in with the lack of clans and protection. Especially for a...full-blooded vampire?” Scarlett blinked, wondering if she was right in pinning him as one.
The scent she had picked up at the start of their conversation seemed almost...fuzzy. Had it been vampire? What were they talking about?
“Well, like you mentioned, spring break! A few buddies and I wanted to come party here. It’s...not the most expensive trip. They found themselves some dates tonight and I was interested in checking out this place so here I am. We took a break from the clans, needed to get away.” Brodie took a drink of his iced beer.
Or lack of ice. The warmth outside had already destroyed what remained.
“I really love traveling.” He pointed to his tattoos, then.
He tried to keep that boyish charm in place no matter how much the facade disgusted him. “Scotland, Ireland, and I’m thinking of getting an American flag somewhere. Too much?”
Scarlett felt a rush of dizziness as she tried to focus on her words. Her brows furrowed, hand reaching out for the railing as she steadied herself. Must have been the heat, more likely the humidity. “Ah, American flag? Definitely too much. Almost as bad as tribal tattoos if you ask me.”
She pushed off the railing, weeble wobbling slightly. “Ah, sorry. I think the heat is getting to me a bit. Might be time to get inside.”
Brodie leaned forward with a smile, his eyes bleeding black as that ancient power of the vampires rose to the surface. An ability that had developed to protect and assist with feedings, now used to collect a paycheck and bragging rights. He always loved this part of the hunt, when he was finally narrowing in on his prey.
“I can help you, don’t you worry.”
Scarlett nodded, hand reaching out to grab a hold of his shirt. “Yeah, please. My friend.. Gordon...inside. Please bring me to him.”
His Scottish accent spilled from honeyed lips as Brodie’s hands secured on Scarlett’s arm and led her back towards the stairs that led down the back porch and away from the bar. The suggestion was a purr that caught her attention and demanded control.
“Aye, just follow me, lass.”
~

Gordon had taken up a spot a few tables away from the bar. It was a little quieter, a spot where he could keep an eye on Scarlett and the folks coming and going. Not that he was too worried. They were in fucking Bali for Christ sakes. The middle of nowhere.
Getting up, he excused himself to use the restroom. In the three weeks they had been there, they hadn’t stumbled upon another supernatural and what were the chances they would in the ten minutes he was gone? Slim to none, really. Plus he felt...odd. Despite having only one drink, Gordon felt out of sorts. Stumbling out to the hallway he realized that he didn’t remember seeing Scarlett before he went to the bathroom. When he returned? She was gone, that much was certain.
The werebear let out a growl, storming over to the bar. Slapping the bar top, he glared at one of the bartenders. The only man who spoke English there and one he had seen Scarlett talk to often, even snuck to the bathrooms with once or twice. Not that he’d ever report that back to anyone. He’d lose his job and the poor guy would lose his head if her fathers found out.
Fathers. It was something that felt odd to Gordon normally but in that moment he almost wanted to giggle over the thought. No...focus. He had to find Scarlett.
 “Where did she go?”
“Out back. She needed air I guess. Sucking Grey Goose down like it’s going out of style.” He shrugged.
Gordon snarled, storming out of the bar and onto the back deck. When he reached it, the only people to be seen where two locals. Men he recognized from the time they spent here. Either Scarlett had intentionally slipped him, which wasn’t at all a far-fetched idea, or she had been found and taken.
Attempting not to panic, he dug into his pocket and sent Scarlett a quick text. She had a half an hour to reply before he sounded the alarm. No, make it ten seconds. It wasn’t the first time she had squirmed away from him, especially if a male was involved. But she always responded right away, knowing shit would hit the fan if she didn’t. Even if she didn’t tell him where she was right away, she always texted back. It was her way of ensuring he didn’t report that she had slipped away. Not that it wouldn’t be just as damning to him as it would be to her future travel plans.
Gordon stalked forward, looming over the men as he stared them down. “Have you seen the girl? The one that I always come here with. Scarlett?”
The shorter of the two peered up at him. “Yes, gone with another.” He bit out in broken English.
Gordon blew out a sigh of relief. Of course this was about a male. Scarlett and those fucking humans. He damn near cringed at the thought.
 She was going to be the death of him.

Chapter Two



Scarlett’s body felt heavy, like each limb weighed a hundred pounds. Her mouth was dry, head pounding from the migraine that had brought her to consciousness. Slowly she forced one eye open, then the other.
The room she was being held in was dark, almost pitch black, but it was easy for her to see with the vampire blood pulsing through her veins. There was no furniture aside from a chair on the opposite side of the room, and a mattress with a blanket a few feet away from her. She sniffed at the air, the only scent she picked up on was one she barely recognized.
Scarlett tried to move, hands straining against the chains wrapped around her wrists. God dammit, as much as she tried, those were chains she couldn’t use her magic to burn through. Glancing down, she noted her ankles were bound as well. She heaved out a sigh, head tipping back against the wall she had been propped up against. Think, think.
She racked her brain, trying to remember what happened. She remembered being at the bar, remembered needing air… She focused harder, trying to ignore the sharp jabs shooting through her skull. Gah. The guy...a man had followed her out of the bar. Nathan? Neil? Nick! But that name had to have been bullshit...but why was she here? No one knew she was in Bali. Even if they did, it was a snowball’s chance in hell they knew who she was. Maybe it was someone connected to the clan in Scotland or her home in New York? Scarlett squirmed, attempting to feel for her phone in her back pocket where it always was.
Of course it wasn’t there, why would it be that easy?
“I dinnae think you’d be up this early.” Brodie’s voice broke through the room, one hand lifting to turn on the light as he entered.
It had been too easy, texting her little body guard that she was busy until morning and would head back, then tossing the damn phone off into nowhere land.
Best case scenario, her thug would agree to wait until morning, and by that point they would be already too far away for him to catch up. Without her phone on her, there was no way she’d be tracked. Unless they tagged Scarlett. But from what his research said she didn’t have any sort of tracking device on her person.
“Now I can properly introduce ma self. Brodie Campbell. I’ve been hired tae bring you back home, Highness. I’m sad tae cut the Spring Break festivities short.” Brodie took a seat in the chair across from her, leaning forward.
The cigar in his mouth hung downward, dark eyes on her, hyper-focused. Billowing smoke rose in the air and lingered around his head, thicker and thicker with each exhale.
Scarlett felt her fangs elongate, eyes bleeding black as she growled over at the cavalier Brodie. There was no need for the man to explain who he was or why he was there. The moment he opened his mouth and that Scottish accent flowed out? There was no explanation needed. He was a Scot. Someone from her homeland. Someone her parents had warned her for years would come for her again. Scarlett could feel her body heating up, her magic on a hair trigger as she remembered him calling her lass back at the bar. A mere moment before she allowed him to lead her away and everything went black.
“There’s the lightbulb, yer Highness.”
“Don’t call me that.” She snapped.
“I have no interest in going back to Scotland. Let me go. I can promise you my parents will pay double what they’re paying you.” She quickly added, eyes narrowing as she tried to spark up more magic at her fingertips.
But there was still a lingering fuzziness, one that rendered her useless.
Brodie looked amused, not even a twitch on his face until her magic fought out against the bonds. For a moment, the corners of his mouth tilted upward, tips of his own fangs poking out from behind his lips. He seemed taken aback by her attempt to use magic.
But still his eyes remained completely calm. “No. I have done ma research on yer family, Scarlett. Millie, Jax, Julian, Jake...King Derek? They donnae have the money yer old family does. Plus, it’s a pride thing now, lass. Donnae want me to look weak in front of new employers.” He took a few steps towards her then.
His eyes glanced down to the light at her hands. The drugs had certainly weakened her power and for that he was thankful. Not that it would be easy to get out of all those chains, anyway.
“Private flight coming for you. Better than yer family offered. Coach? That looked miserable. Hardly fit fer royalty. But this ride has been well set up.” He took the cigar from his lips the moment he drew in, the smell of rich spices from it filling the room around them.
Leaning forward slightly, Brodie smiled over at her. So close, he could smell the shampoo she had obtained during her travel. The deep scent of jasmine. Moving his hand out, he offered the cigar to her, fully expecting retaliation.
But he had never been one to not poke at others. Especially when he had the upper hand.
Scarlett watched him intensely, eyes darting to his fangs when she saw the tips poking between his lips. He was a pureblood sure, but her magic should have still landed him on his ass a few times. Unfortunately, the drugs she had been given had severely weakened her. Of course her blood family would have known exactly what to give her to keep her magic at bay. They had been trying to obtain her since the moment of her birth.
“Old money. Excellent. So you’re willing to put my head on a chopping block to make a few bucks? Wonderful person you are.” She snapped.
“Terrible, actually. Yes, that’s the plan.”
“At least you can admit it.” She retorted.
Her muscles were tense, lip curling back to expose her long fangs. He was entirely too close to her, the stink of his cigar offending her sensitive nostrils. “Fuck. Off.” Scarlett snapped at his hand, fangs intent on making contact with it but he moved his hand out of the way just in time.
“I like ya, Scarlett. Pretty, lots of fight. But I am no’ a fan of that...” Brodie pointed to her soft, glowing hands.
Before she could blink his cigar was back between his lips, one hand lashing out to plug her nose. The other moved towards her fangs, the smallest little pill in his hands. “Just...swallow this, will ye?” He growled, attempting to get the small thing in her mouth.
Time for another dose to ensure she was under control.
Scarlett had a snippy reply at the tip of her tongue, ready to tell him to go fuck himself again when his hand shot out and snagged her nose. Reluctantly, her mouth opened purely out of survival instinct. That tiny white pill hit her tongue and she tried to spit it back out at him. Not a fucking chance. Not again.
He was not above playing dirty, hand braving her fangs as he pushed it past her tongue, slicing his knuckle along the sharpness at the same time. Several drops of his blood fell into her mouth before he moved it away, leaning down close to her ear as he tucked that same hand under her chin, pushing her mouth closed. “Swallow.” He growled, the tone a deep rumble.
Scarlett made sure to let her fangs gnash against the back of his hand as he shoved it into her mouth to push that vile little pill further. It was difficult to ignore the taste of his blood, especially when he forced her mouth shut and saliva started to pool. Brown eyes met his eyes and stayed there, refusing to swallow as he demanded. But it was like having a mouthful of delicious cake, being denied the full experience. His blood was delicious and gave her clarity, an energy that far suppressed the haziness of the drugs.
Instead of anger over the bite, instead of being enraged over her lack of acceptance over the pill…Brodie was laughing. The deep rumble of his tone filling the room as he shook his head. One hand firmly on her nose while the other remained on her chin, drops of his blood falling to the floor beneath them. His hand tightened to secure her mouth shut, knowing it was only a matter of time before she was forced to swallow.
Leaning forward, he moved his mouth to his hand, ignoring how close it put both of their faces as his tongue darted out and licked the wound. At least it would stop the pouring of blood. Looking to her, he stared at Scarlett head-on.
“Unless that magic ye have can keep ye from breathing, you’ll need tae swallow. This one won’t knock ye out...but lack of oxygen will.”
She was not going down without a fight. Even if that meant passing out from sheer stubbornness. Scar said nothing, mouth filling as her eyes blazed with anger. She wanted to swing, wanted to punch him right in that smug face. Especially because he was right.
But her body betrayed her and she swallowed the pill along with the mouth full of saliva and his blood. The second the pill dropped down her throat, she jerked against his hands viciously, trying to get away from his hold. She didn’t believe for a single second that it wasn’t going to put her lights out again.
He let go of her nose and face, giving her cheek the softest of pats before backing away. Brodie took a long drag of his cigar, ashing it in the air before glancing back to the door. That acute hearing of his picked up on footsteps heading towards them. Only one person had their location and the steps were far too light to be Gordon’s. Not that he would have been able to find them that fast, anyway.
Of course, his employers always made sure he knew who the boss was; Whether it was by outright saying it, or making power moves. The moment Brodie smelled the expensive Chanel of Victoria’s? He knew Scarlett’s rich family was doing everything in their power to ensure he knew they had him by the balls, even if that meant sending his ex-wife to help retrieve Scarlett.
The door opened, Victoria’s red hair the first thing seen as she made her way inside. Behind her was another vampire he was unfamiliar with. But Victoria had been a bounty hunter for quite some time, surely this had to be one of the lackeys she had been working with.
“Lookie what ya found, love.” She purred, eyes on Brodie for several long, lingering moments before flicking over to Scarlett.
Brodie said nothing in response, his dark eyes focused on Scarlett, anything but the other two in the room. The less he had to deal with Victoria, the better.
Scarlett’s eyes darted from Brodie to the door, the male’s cigar overpowering the scent of perfume until the woman entered the room. Another vampire. Another purebred. Her eyes pinned on the redhead, lip curling in a silent snarl. Her fangs were still out, ready to inflict more damage on someone.
Victoria approached her, heels hard against the floor of the room, emerald eyes gleaming as she stopped in front of her, one hand extending to rest on Brodie’s shoulder. He shrugged it away, taking an even longer pull from his cigar.
“Still smoking those, love? I hate it.”
“Ta repel you.” He murmured, glancing back finally to the other man. “Who’s tha goon?”
“Partner…Leon.” Victoria shrugged, the man giving Brodie a short nod.
He was big, real big. Footsteps Brodie should have picked up on, should have worried would be Scarlett’s bodyguard. But clearly he had stopped searching for who the additional steps belonged to the moment her perfume hit him.
“We’ve got the transportation outside. Let’s get her on. Leon, want tae grab her?” Victoria inquired, looking to her goon.
“I’ve got her.” Brodie growled, breaking the distance and approaching Scarlett. “Bite me an I make sure the next pill knocks ya out.” Came his soft words, barely heard before he leaned down, pulling keys from his pocket.
Scarlett eyed him cautiously, a nagging suspicion she should trust him despite him being the one to take her. That female behind him, she seemed far colder than Brodie was at that time, and that was saying something. She swallowed and gave him a quick nod, knowing better than to speak.
But he didn’t unchain her hands, simply unlocked the chains from the wall behind her, leaning down to grab her small body and lift her to her feet.
“Why isn’t she out cold?” Victoria sighed, one hand rising to pinch the bridge of her nose.
“Just open tha door.” Brodie hissed out, the venom in his voice clear as day.
“Where are you taking me?” Scarlett finally ground out.
Brodie heaved her over one shoulder, making his way towards the door without another glance at Victoria or Leon.
“Home, lass. We’re taking ya home.”

Chapter Three



The charter aircraft was incredibly luxurious, but Scarlett’s blood family didn’t have an issue flexing their spending muscles. Especially when it came to ensuring their bounty hunters were well taken care of and knew where their loyalties remained. Such would lead to getting what they wanted and quickly.
So why was Brodie convinced something was wrong? When he carried Scarlett up and into the aircraft, placing her in one of the leather seats in the back...he could not shake the feeling that he had a gun to the back of his head. That the snake Victoria had something else up her sleeve. But he had obtained Scarlett, had done everything they could have wanted. So surely his employers were not looking to get rid of him or complicate things further. This was a small bit of power being placed over him but in the end, it was also backup if anything went wrong.
Turning Scarlett in would gain Brodie favor with the King. The King’s number one hired help, the first to be called and the first to be paid. Finally, a secure position that didn’t leave him traveling around the world, hoping his living targets didn’t find him and finally finish him off. It was rough being a bounty hunter, especially when the targets were pissed off. For once he wanted to stay in Scotland, wanted to settle down with all the money he had gained and feel safe.
Brodie took a seat next to Scarlett, not taking the chains off her as his eyes scanned over the jet and the other two on it. Where was the staff? Clearly it was going to be a cramped, long flight back home with the four of them and the pilot.
“So. Why’d they send ya, Vic? Seems like that would be takin’ ye away from some good work back home…”
Her emerald eyes shot up the moment she took a seat across from the two of them, her legs crossing at the ankle in front; heels long forgotten in the empty chair next to her.
“Just wanted tae see yer face, Brodie.” There was a slow, forced smile on her ruby red lips.
Scarlett’s magic buzzed just below the surface next to Brodie. It was a dull roar, one that reminded Brodie the power she possessed. Power she was born with. If she could just refuse the next dose of sedatives, she would be fine...she would use her magic against the two of them, the strength of her vampire side would assist her.
With a huff, she shifted in her seat and turned toward the window. Dark brown eyes stared out at nothing. How long had she been gone? Surely Gordon would have caught onto something being wrong by now and if that were the case, hopefully he would sound the alarm.
Her parents would turn to the Scots first, monitoring all of their chatter. They would probably even send a team to investigate the castle. With any luck, she would still be alive by then. Scarlett could feel her eyes changing, bleeding black as Victoria’s shrill voice filled the cabin. She may have hated Brodie, but something about Victoria made her want to smash the female’s face in with a brick.
Brodie noticed the black, eyes scanning over Scarlett’s face before he smirked, sitting back in his chair, one hand moving to absentmindedly touch the ring through his ear. The jewelry on his fingertips a soft, melodic chime against each other.
“I do hate it when ye do that.” Victoria snapped, her own eyes bleeding red.
“Do what, love?” Brodie murmured, the sound intensifying.
“Enough.” Leon growled, his eyes closed as the jet started off.
It was going to be a long ride for them all and it was clear he wasn’t going to spend it listening to the squabbling ex-lovers and the huffy Scarlett.
Brodie smiled slowly, unable to shake the feeling that something was incredibly wrong with the situation at hand. “Seriously, Vic. Why you two?”
“Because they donnae trust ye to do the job. Loose cannon, Brodie. We all know it.”
Brodie didn’t respond, dark eyes looking over to the windows as the jet hit the air, only water and the horizon. It wasn’t true. Once he was on a job he didn’t leave it. It was the time in between that he was hard to tie down. Something was incredibly wrong.
Scarlett’s jaw tightened, her teeth gnashing against each other as she fought to keep her mouth under control. Brodie was right, the pill didn’t knock her out, it simply kept her magic at bay. Practically made her useless. No, not practically.
Jerking slightly, she blinked when her fangs jabbed into her bottom lip. Apparently, those fangs were her only line of defense. Wasn’t that frustrating as fuck? When Victoria spoke again, Scarlett’s head snapped around. “Brodie, love, could you do me a favor and stop talking to her? I’m getting really, really tired of hearing her voice. Thanks.”
That woman burned an unexplainable anger right down to the pit of her soul. If only she could get her hands free…
Victoria was up and out of her chair the moment Scarlett’s last word left her lips. She broke the distance between them, emerald eyes a mere inch away from her face as Victoria’s hand grasped Scarlett’s chin; her long, unpainted nails digging into the skin. Her face was twisted in rage, eyes bleeding black as her own long fangs protruded.
“Yer dead, witch. Just like yer parents are. I cannae imagine what they plan tae do with yer power, but I know it’s gonnae hurt.”
Scarlett growled, the sound low from the back of her throat. Victoria’s nails may have been digging into her sensitive skin but Scarlett was preparing to shower her face with a mouth full of spit. Only her moment of satisfaction was stolen when Brodie’s body jerked beside her.
His hand launched upward, catching Victoria by surprise as it made contact with her shoulder. The power behind it broke her grasp on Scarlett and sent her tripping backwards. The thud of her ass on the jet floor made him laugh. But the sound was clipped, coming from behind his own fangs.
“She’s ma prisoner, wench. So don’t touch. Sit yer ass down.” He looked over to Scarlett, then. “Yer right, it’s mighty annoyin’.”
Victoria was spitting mad as she lifted herself to her feet, body vibrating in anger as one finger pointed towards Scarlett. “Dead. Yer dead, girl.”
Scarlett met Victoria’s stare, another growl ripping through her as her lip curled back and exposed her fangs. She felt like a feral animal. “So I’ve heard. Since I was a child, actually. And yet...I’m still here. Still breathing. Can’t say you’ll be once my family gets their hands on you, bitch.”
Victoria was ready to run forward for another attack when Leon’s hand secured on her wrist. “Enough.” Leon snapped, again.
Victoria growled, whipping it away and turning from the group of them, her body storming off towards the front of the jet, away from eyesight.
“Were ye gonnae spit at her?” Brodie murmured, then. Eyes curious and full of humor as he looked to Scarlett. “I should have waited. It’s so nice tae have ma ex-wife and prisoner finally meet.” His hands clasped together, the sarcastic words quick to fall from his lips.
Scarlett shrugged. “Maybe I was, maybe I wasn’t. But you stole the thunder of whatever it was I was planning.” Her eyes followed the redhead, staring at the area she had vanished off to for a moment longer.
She’d be back eventually.
“Why would you marry a creature like that? I mean, not that you’re some kind of saint. You’re actually kind of a dick, but her? Why her? She’s pure evil, I can feel it in my bones.” Scarlett shifted in her seat, eyes on Brodie for the first time.
He was watching her, studying her with his dark eyes. At her question, another twitch of a smile crossed his lips, one that stretched the scar on his cheek, making it seem deeper and wider suddenly. A gift from before his transition. Something that would never heal.
“I’m one hundred an’ twelve years old, lass. More than enough time tae make a million mistakes. Besides...she was one hell of a lay.” He shrugged, finally looking away.
Scarlett snorted, rolling her eyes. “No lay is worth dealing with that.” She fell quiet again, turning to face the seat in front of her.
Brodie’s hand was resting on one of many knives he had packed along. Happy he had them close by once Victoria and Leon had shown up. He didn’t know the man, had no idea what he was capable of and why he had been paired with Victoria.
He didn’t want to.
He just wanted to get Scarlett to Scotland, collect his money, and hide away for a while. Messing with the Keepers in New York? It wasn’t just a city group. They spread far and wide, and with the collection of magical users and treaties with other groups they possessed? Yeah, he wasn’t down to play anymore. His mission was over. Disgusting magic users had done more than their fair share in the past to make him shy away. Killing his parents, probably top of the list.
He and Scarlett had just a little too much in common, but that wasn’t going to change anything.
After a few minutes of silence, Scarlett spoke up again. “How long were you married for?”
It was a long flight. Too long for her to stay silent. Being quiet was never one of Scar’s strong suits. She was a talker through and through. Not so much as a kid, back then she was mostly observant, but as the years passed her mouth became relentless.
“I haven’t had the chance to find love yet. You know that right? I’ve never been married. Never had a chance at a family of my own…”
“Twenty years, roughly. Off an’ on. Good thing ye haven’t had a family or found love, it would have made ye miserable, lass.” Brodie said then, his eyes closed as he kicked out his boots and rested.
Not at all phased by her attempt to gain some sympathy from her kidnapper. Leon seemed to have already passed out across from them, his heavy breathing filling the cabin. But Brodie knew he would only find some minor comfort, not sleep. He had to stay alert until she was delivered safely.
“I need ye to know I’ll speak, but I’ll not free ye. I’ll not pity ye. I’ve been watching fer quite some time. That pity you’re trying to get from me? It would make ye sick, if I’ve got your personality right?” He knew he did, too.
That little act she had just tried to pull? Scarlett would rather die than actually have others pity her. It was one of her last cards with the sedative in place.
Scarlett stared at him, mouth closing as her teeth grit once again. The hands that were cuffed and resting in her lap desperately wanted to cross over her chest as she let out another huff. How well did this man know her? How long had he been watching her?
With a growl, she turned away from him and burrowed against the seat. Her eyes closed there was no way in hell she was going to continue the conversation, but she knew well enough that sleep wouldn’t come.

Chapter Four



Victoria’s emerald eyes were watching them all from the cockpit door. The man flying the plane had been paid very well to keep his mouth shut, and it was certain that none of their employers would have any idea what really happened there once things got rolling.
It was quite simple, really. She just had to get rid of Brodie.
There were three parachutes on board and they would be put to use. The pilot, Leon, Victoria...and of course that nasty little bitch worth so much money. She would be attached to Leon, unable to fight her way free with the drugs in her system.
If the drop didn’t scare the shit out of her, first.
Victoria didn’t give a rat’s ass if Scarlett was the rightful heir to the throne. She was simply a pawn her uncle would use to gain treaties with other groups. A power and bloodline that would be harnessed for his own purposes. Scarlett would never rule, and once she was used up there was no doubt she would be properly disposed of. Her power was the only reason she was still alive to this day; although Victoria had no idea how she had been able to survive the High Moon Gang and their previous attempts. Scarlett was a nuisance, and thankfully Victoria’s job would be over soon.
However, her uncle wouldn’t be too happy about one of his best bounty hunters dying. Victoria would miss that stupid face of Brodie’s as well. But it had to be done. She would be the best bounty hunter once he disappeared, she would claim she apprehended Scarlett herself, enabling her to collect the bounty. The pilot? He would vouch for them all. When the plane went down with Brodie in it, they would be the only survivors, and there was no way Scarlett’s word would hold any weight.
It wasn’t the most flawless of plans, but it was born of her last bit of desperation. One last attempt to get on top and get rid of Brodie. If the plane had to go down like Lost? So be it.
Her bare feet slowly moved through the cabin, one hand resting on Leon’s shoulder. His eyes opened immediately, looking across to the seemingly asleep Brodie and Scarlett. It was time and they were all prepared. There was an anticipation that passed from Victoria to Leon, an energy in the air as they started getting ready for the offense.
It had been a long travel day, already the next night taking over the sky around them; helping to fuel each and every vampire on the jet. Although the sunlight did not burn them up as it had in the distant past, they were still sensitive to it. Thank goodness for adapting and evolving through the sensitive parts of their transitioning bloodlines. How vampires truly ruled in the past, Victoria did not know.
Leon stood, grabbing the backpack she handed him and pulling it over his shoulders and securing it in place just as Victoria’s was. Already the pilot was changing their direction, aiming for a plot of land a few miles outside the castle. An easy drop for the three. After that, he was directed to take the plane further off, to aim it straight towards the water. He’d jump out and meet them before they all rendezvous at the castle. Their story; the plane had difficulties and they had to crash land. Brodie? No...he had died by the hand of Scarlett’s bodyguard, Victoria had obtained Scarlett shortly after.
Victoria didn’t want to see Brodie dead by her own hands, but in the end it was all the same. He was nothing but a bother to her and no matter the history they had, it was time for him to be done. The money attached to Scarlett could not be beat by any mission. It was a retirement fund. With the drugs in Scarlett’s system, they had a few more hours before they were actually faced with whatever the girl could do. It was time to move. Time to turn her in.
Perhaps then, Scarlett’s uncle, the King, would look at her with worth. Maybe that would open the door for Victoria to have a more personal relationship with him. Queen...
Licking her lips with anticipation, Victoria nodded to Leon. His guns were pulled a moment later, the cold steel pressed against Brodie’s head.
Brodie’s eyes opened immediately, a growl filling the room. Eyes black, Brodie’s hand clenched above his throwing knives but froze when he finally digested the situation he was in.
“Drop yer hand.” Victoria’s spat.
He did, slowly.
Brodie’s growl had Scarlett’s eyes snapping open. She awoke instantly, fully on alert as she glanced around and took in what was happening. Leon, two guns pressed against Brodie’s temple, Victoria just behind him.
What the fuck was going on?
Her hands jerked up, only to be met by the sharp metal of the cuffs. The jab of pain earned a growl from Scarlett as she shifted in her seat to face their new attackers. “I told you she was a bitch.” She spat, eyes locked on the female.
“No...kidding.” Brodie said through gritted teeth, his fangs sharp against his lip. “I wondered if ye were here ta take her bounty.” he said. The words were directed towards Victoria.
“Well, correct. Hand over yer knives. Otherwise I’ll spread yer brains all over this jet.”
Both guns were cocked, Leon was positively deadly and Brodie wasn’t stupid enough to tango with him.
Brodie slowly put his hands to his side, pulling out both knives. Knowing there was no way he’d get them imbedded in the two of them before he was a dead man. Vampires were not immortal, not when headshots were involved. He tossed the cold steel to the ground in front of him, eyes never leaving Victoria.
“Can’t turn down the money, ye know that.” She said, smile widening as she made her way to the side of the jet.
The door had already been prepped and unlocked for them. “Scarlett, yer comin’ with us.” Victoria said then.
Leon lowered one gun, then, pointing it right at Brodie’s knee.
“No the fuck I’m not.” She would die on that plane before she went anywhere with the two of them.
There was a shot and Brodie yelled out, doubling forward as blood poured from his kneecap. “Fuckin’...whore…” He spat, trying to scramble forward towards the knives but they were kicked from his grasp.
There was a racking pain in his knee, one that would take far too long to heal. Leon turned quickly, rough hand grabbing onto Scarlett as he yanked her body over to his. Scarlett snarled, snapping at Leon’s hand as he reached for her. If she thought Brodie was strong, Leon certainly bested him as he dragged all one hundred and thirty-five pounds of her over Brodie.
She actually felt bad for him, watching him curled over as blood spilled onto the white carpet. But she had little time to worry about Brodie. Her survival instincts kicked in, fangs making contact with Leon’s arm as he hauled her backward. She was furious, kicking out and thrashing in his grasp. Her magic lit up, dulled, lit up again. It was like an electrical surge that couldn’t stay sparked. She was fucked.
“Let me go!” She ground out.
Leon growled, twisting her around towards his gun. But instead of threatening Scarlett with it, the steel hit the back of her head. Not hard enough to kill her, but enough to render her unconscious; stunning her enough to force her against him. He then made quick work strapping her into the harness. Victoria was laughing madly as she faced the whipping winds before her.
Looking over her shoulder at Brodie, she pulled her own gun from her side, pointing it towards him. “Can’t let ye die in front of me. I’ll let tha crash do it.” Her gun went off, sending Brodie backwards once more, hands lowering to his stomach and the blossoming bloodstain. 
Victoria crossed her arms over her chest and allowed herself to fall backwards off the jet and into the air, knowing Leon would be quick to follow.
“Toodleloo, Brodie!”

~

Brodie’s sight was starting to fade. How long had he been on the floor? Had he lost consciousness after they left? It was hard to say. The shadow of their pilot crossed his vision but a moment later the man was gone out the open window.
There was beeping and screaming around him, the jet dropping so fast Brodie’s stomach seemed to fly. Or was that the wound? Right...the wound. He needed…
Brodie was crawling, dragging his useless leg behind him as he reached out for his bag. But it was too far, the shot in his stomach a wreck of pain that cascaded through his body. Thankfully, the jet jerked to the side, his bag flying off his seat and towards him. Brodie’s hands were bloodstained and shaking as he grunted through the pain, fumbling with the zippers.
Where was it...blood...where. Got it.
He had the bag in his hands, keeping it close as he drug himself towards the rear seats of the jet, behind the wing. It was close enough to the door to see the Atlantic Ocean below. Each second brought him closer and closer to impact. Fuck…
His fangs tore into the blood bag, allowing the cold, old substance to fall between his lips as fast as possible. Not enough to ensure he didn’t die in the crash but enough to help. Already he could feel the blood healing his insides bit-by-bit. Bitch should have checked his bag.
Was he going to risk staying there and hoping the rear seat would save his life? No. Not when the water filled the aircraft and drug him down with it
Brodie swore again, over and over under his breath as his strengthened body lurched forward towards the open window. Closer...closer...he saw the waves crashing against each other, building towards the shore.
With a quick prayer to every God and Goddess he had ever been told of, Brodie grabbed for his knives along the way and tucked them back at his side, throwing his body out the window and hitting the Atlantic with a force he never knew possible.
Almost instantly, his body was knocked unconscious, the plane crashing into the water in turn.
Above, the Gods watched carefully.

Chapter Five



Scarlett came to in the middle of their descent. Her body was pressed firmly against Leon, she knew it was him from his scent. But what she didn’t realize right away? Both of their bodies were plummeting toward the ground.
Holyfuckingshit. This was it, this was how she was going to die. They should have just shot her on the plane, it would have been faster.
But she was sure torture was Victoria’s game.
Scarlett’s mouth opened to scream but when she tried, nothing came out. The wind knocked the breath from her lungs, choking her as it smashed against the skin on her face. Her eyes stung with unshed tears that soon turned to a stream that disappeared the moment it arrived, taken away by the whipping air around her. If she had just one more phone call...one more chance to not leave that fucking bar.
Panic seized her chest, constricting as they got closer and closer to the ground. The blurred masses before her were beginning to take shape.
“Hold on tight, Girlie.” Leon rumbled in her ear as he pulled the line for chute release.
The two of them were yanked backward before they started to fall again, only this time slower. They were heading for an open field right near the forest. This had to be Scotland, but how far from the castle were they? Perhaps she would die on impact. Scarlett stiffened, eyes squeezing shut as she tried to ignore what was about to happen.
A moment later, Scarlett and Leon slammed into the ground with a thud. Scarlett cried out, cuffed hands unable to brace for impact.
Leon seemed to recover faster, even after their bodies hit the ground and rolled. He was quick to get to his feet, involuntarily hauling Scarlet up with him as he stood. His hand moved to the clasp, unhooking her from the harness.
Scarlett stumbled forward, dropping to her knees when he released her. Her entire body felt like jello as she tumbled toward the earth. “Oh for fuck’s sake.” She snarled as her face connected with the dirt. Pain radiated through her body, stunning her silent as she fought to catch her breath. How much dirt did she eat? Didn’t matter, Scarlett simply opened her mouth, allowing the ground to fall out as she assessed the damage to her body.
Leon’s hand shot out, grabbing her by the back of her shirt to pull her back up to her feet. “Get on yer damn feet.” He snarled, pushing her forward as they started off toward Victoria.
The demonic redhead had hit the ground moments before in a heap of manic laughter. Presumably because she had successfully pulled off what Scarlett assumed was Brodie’s murder. That poor bastard. She actually felt bad for him.
“Where’s tah fuckin’ cah, Vic?” Leon kept a hold on Scarlett’s upper arm. “I’m not walkin’ all the way to tah castle.”
“There.” Victoria sighed, finally sitting up and pointing across the field.
There was a black SUV making its way toward them, stopping a few feet away. “Let’s meet yer uncle, bitch.” Victoria spat over her shoulder at Scarlett, already opening the car door and jumping in before the driver had a chance to open it for her.
She was clearly in a hurry and wasn’t going to wait any longer.
Leon followed close behind, pushing Scarlett toward the vehicle. It would be a short drive and another car was already off to pick up their pilot. The King would be hearing about the crash in no time.
Scarlett ducked just in time to avoid getting her head smashed into the door frame. A soft growl erupted as she was forced into the seat next to Victoria, effectively pinned between her and the big goon. “Yippee, I always love a family reunion.” She spat sarcastically.
Brown eyes stared dead ahead, looking at the road as they drove in silence. How long would it take to get there? Would she be killed on arrival? So many thoughts rolled through her mind.
A few minutes later, they pulled up to an iron gate. It stood strong and tall, green vines entangling the bars and making their home up towards the barred top. Much like the hands of Scarlett’s family as they grew ever closer to her throat. The driver pressed a button and released the gates, allowing them access to the property a moment later, driving the car forward to her doom.
The stone driveway was long, at least a mile and a half, and the castle? It was huge, bigger than anything Scarlett had ever seen before. There must have been fifteen...twenty different wings. And technically, all of it belonged to her. Her damn birthright. It was made of stone, reaching upward to the clouded sky above. Figures moved through the darkness outside, eyes weighing heavily on the car and who approached.
When the car came to a stop, Leon was the first one out. He grabbed Scarlett by the upper arm and pulled her out of the vehicle. Dragging her toward the front door, he stopped halfway up the stairs when the two grand doors swung open. A man stood before them, guarded on all sides.
The man who greeted them was well over six foot five inches, built like a brick shit house. His black hair was buzzed short, emerald eyes resembling the father she had only seen in photos. He looked...so much like him. Scarlett swallowed.
Ronan.
“My ‘uncle’ I presume?” She choked out, still tasting dirt from her landing.
“Nice tah finally meet the right pain in my arse.” There was a cruel smile there, one that Scarlett found oddly familiar but she was unable to place, having never truly met her uncle.
Victoria broke the distance, beaming over at Ronan as she combed one hand through her curly red hair, hair that was less than neat after their fall from the sky. “My Lord, just as ye suspected, Brodie could no’ finish tah job. I have brought her to ye.” She was beaming.
The pilot made his way behind them. “We had technical issues, but we are all well. Where should we put her?” She inquired then, waving a hand in Scarlett’s direction as though she were merely dirt beneath her feet.
Scarlett jerked out of Leon’s hold, eyes narrowing as they pinned on Victoria. “Well now, I know we all have our issues here...but she’s a fuckin’ liar. Brodie had me and was taking me in. This psycho slut shot him.” She jerked her chin in Victoria’s direction.
Ronan shrugged. “Don’t really care who brought ya in.” Without another word, he turned and headed into the castle, gesturing for them to follow.
Victoria was smiling wildly, giving Scarlett a wink as she followed along. Her eyes watched Ronan like a hawk. A power hungry, predatory hawk. It was clear she was hoping to gain much more than just some money from the entire affair, and so far things were going just as she had hoped. Better yet...there was no pang of sadness over Brodie’s death like she had thought there might be. Clearly it had been a long time coming.
Leon headed inside, pushing Scarlett along as well.
“She will be comin’ out of tah drug’s hold soon.” Victoria warned Ronan with a bow of her head, falling behind his step as they entered the castle.
The eyes of the few guards that had been allowed to be around when Scarlett was brought in watched them all carefully. Not too many knew of Scarlett’s existence, and that was for the best if Ronan hoped to keep the throne.
Ronan led them to his office, pausing after he entered and turned to face the trio. “Leon stay out there. Just Vic an tah girl fer now.”
Scarlett rolled her eyes and started forward. No sense in putting up a fight with so many guards around.
Victoria was buzzing with excitement as she entered his office, not sparing a glance for Leon and the lingering pilot. No, they didn’t mean anything anymore. She’d collect her money, pay them the measly amount she had promised, and after that she’d plan her next move.
Although she had to admit she was curious what Ronan would say to the girl after hunting her for so long. He needed her alive, her mixed blood would easily provide him with what he needed to keep the throne...but what was he going to do with her in the meantime? While that power was slowly and surely drained from her for his benefit?
The power Ronan had was something Victoria wanted more than anything. That was enough to keep her mouth shut and her loyalties aligned with him for all this time. Closing the door behind them, she turned towards the King, awaiting his word.
Ronan headed to his desk, taking a seat in the old leather chair. The seat creaked beneath him, protesting against his weight. Gesturing toward the two seats across from him, he cleared his throat. “Sit, both of ya.”
“Scarlett, I’ll deal with yah after. Vic, tell me more about Brodie. Wha happen?” He didn’t care the guy was dead but he wanted to know the situation.
“He could no’ get the job done.” Victoria shrugged, her emerald eyes fixed on Ronan as she spoke. “He did die, and no’ by my own hand. They can attest tah that.” Her hand pointed to the door and those who were behind it. “Scarlett is so full of drugs, I’m surprised she didn’t tell ya I can shoot flames from ma arse.” There was another shrug, her face neutral and controlled. Amused by Scarlett’s antics.
A natural born liar.
Scarlett’s growl was low, it started from the depths of her chest and echoed into the room as her eyes bled black, fangs elongating. “She’s a fucking liar. She shot him. I saw her shoot him. Heard it. Then that ogre outside dragged me over his bleeding body.” Her eyes were pinned on her uncle.
“You might be a cruel fuck for wanting me dead but don’t believe a word this liar says. How can you trust someone like her?” Scarlett yanked at the cuffs, desperate to get free.
Ronan’s hand shot up, silencing whatever she was going to say. “Silence. I said I would speak to yah when I was finished.” He snapped.
Emerald eyes turned on Victoria. “Yah shoot ‘em? Not a good time tah lie tah meh, lass.”
Victoria’s lips pursed together, brow furrowing. “Sure. I shot him. But I do no’ lie. I said it was no’ by ma own hand. The plane killed him. Either way. I brought her. Twas ma win.” There was a desperation in her voice, something that hid under the shrill tones.
The crazy that a hundred years of hunting and foraging for herself had provided.
Ronan stared at her, shaking his head slightly. “You, outta mah office. I’ve got family matters tah deal with.” He turned to Scarlett then, the niece that had successfully evaded him for over two decades.
“Out.”
Victoria growled, chair sliding away from her body with the force of her push as she headed towards the door. The closing bang of the door echoed throughout the room. Her heavy, bare footsteps headed down the hallway and away from them.
“Now...what am I going to do with you?” Cold eyes landed on Scarlett.
Of course, he already had an idea of what was going to happen to the girl. She was going to die. Simple as that. He had more than enough time to plan what was to happen to her. Along with the magic in her royal blood, he’d work with the magical users in creating his own weapon. One that would ensure he wasn’t taken from his throne. Not by Scarlett, not by anyone. It wasn’t like he hadn’t used magic in the past, no matter how much the two races stayed away from each other. The lands of Scotland were still swarming with renegade fae and witches. Beings that were happy to make some coin.
“Time ta do what you were born fer.” He growled, rounding his desk, body stopping in front of Scarlett.
“Gonnae wish I killed you many years ago, when I’m done with ya.

Chapter Six



Bright lights. That was it, he was dead.
Brodie was certain of it, eyes opening to a room whiter than he could imagine. Forcing him to blink, hands rising to cover his eyes as he groaned, turning to his side and sitting up. There was no pain in his stomach, no pain in his leg. But his entire body was numb, throbbing. Heaven? Yeah, there’s no way he’d be in his body if he was dead and in Heaven. Those were left behind. Bad souls went to Hell, good ones were permitted to be watched by the Gods and Goddesses. So what was this? Purgatory? Was he drowning in his own mind? Falling to the bottom of the Atlantic for no one to find?
Not that anyone would be looking for him.
When the supernatural died, they were just as the dead humans, small bits of energy controlled by Heaven or Hell. Perhaps this was part of his own Hell? Maybe he was just a ball of energy, trapped and made to think he could make his way into Heaven. That made far more sense. Besides, killers didn’t get to meet the divine.
“You awaken.” The voice was soft, musical, and filled the area around him, sending shivers down Brodie’s spine, shortly followed by a warmth he had not been prepared for.
He blinked past the brightness, dark eyes searching for the source of that female voice.
“Who’s there?”
“I am Achelois.”
Brodie had heard that name before. Racking his mind for his list of Gods and Goddesses, pausing when he remembered. A minor moon Goddess, one whose name meant ‘she who washes away pain’. That explained the lack of agony he was in. Especially after that fall...the two shots...hitting the water. There was no way he was going to survive that ordeal so why was he getting some divine intervention? That last minute praying surely could not merit him a visit from a Goddess. Not after all he had done in his life.
“Nice tah meet you.” Brodie murmured, stopping the moment he caught sight of movement across the white room.
Long white hair floated out and around her petite frame as though she swam underwater. Her eyes were white orbs, shining ovals on her pale, porcelain face. Achelois’s body was adorned in a simple pale lace dress that almost seemed to blend in with the empty, bright space around them. It was hard to even make her out as she moved, floating a few feet above the ground, bare feet pointed downwards.
Brodie slowly got to his feet, taking one staggering step towards her. Everything still felt numb but there was no pain, no blood. That was when he realized his own body was dressed in white linen, the fabric comfortable and light upon his skin.
“I wish it was also nice to meet you. I am going against many of my peers by reaching out to you, vampire. But I see good deep down within you, an ability to save an innocent girl from a torturous end. We try not to meddle in the affairs of those below but...I have an offer for you.” Her lips did not move when she spoke, the words dancing through the air, seeming to become louder as they reached Brodie’s ears.
Brodie blinked once, twice, and took a deep breath. Calculating his next actions very carefully, slowly nodding. “Tell me tha offer.”
“You will save the heir and assist in ending the reign of terror over Scotland. Bring her back to her family. They have suffered enough at the hands of evil. She has suffered enough.”
“What...do I get in return?”
She shook her head, a frown crossing her haunting face. “Always about the benefit. I hope that soon will change. For the sake of your soul. In exchange, I will allow you to live to save her. You will be returned to the Earth unharmed. But you are never to speak of this engagement, never to speak of meeting with me except to her. You will also never be blessed or saved again. This is your only chance. Do you accept?”
That was it, he was going to be allowed to live to what? Die by the hands of the King and never allowed another chance? Forfeit his money and the pride of finally catching Scarlett? No...he didn’t have a chance, anyway. He was dead, worthless without the blessing of this Goddess. And Scarlett? He had wanted her long enough to feel the twists of guilt, although very small.
This was it. The only thing that would get him out alive.
“Aye. I acc-” But the words ended in a scream of alarm, body flailing through the air, his stomach lurching as Brodie was dropped.
He hit the water hard, breath knocked out of him for a moment before he swam to the surface, gasping for air the moment he hit the top. Fangs biting for anything...needing contact with anything. It was his own animalistic attempt at life. But there was no pain, no injuries from before. 
Forcing himself to kick rhythmically and breathe for a moment, Brodie slowly regained control over his emotions, thoughts, and body; eyes falling to the west shores of Scotland. There was a small crowd far off, attention on the sinking jet and smoke left behind. None of them looking to him. Perfect.
Had he really just been blessed by a Goddess? That was it, he was going to pledge his life to those fuckers if everything went alright and he was able to live. If there was one thing Brodie had learned in his long and unhappy life, it was that he wanted to live. It had been his desire when his home was attacked by an unknown force, his parents lying dead upon the ground...his own body about to pass to the afterlife. It wasn’t until the vampire who had been following the destructive magic users came across him that he was allowed to live, that he realized what had killed his family.
He had pledged his entire life to keeping himself alive. To taking care of himself. Even when he was with Victoria, they just needed the company, relished in the blood they spilled. But neither of them truly cared if the other died. It was always about themselves. It hadn’t even been until the most recent decade that Brodie started to question it all. Question himself. But never his need to live.
Making his way to shore, he pulled his body up and onto the solid earth. He wanted to kiss it, wanted to roll around but he was on limited time. He had to get Scarlett and...what? Kill the King? Help her kill him? What the hell had he agreed to.
With a groan, Brodie got to his feet and started off down the shore. He had a stop to make. He’d get to his home and grab supplies, change, and get his weapons ready. He knew the castle like the back of his hand and was certain he’d be able to find Scarlett. Especially after Victoria presented him as dead. They wouldn’t suspect him in the slightest. Just one little pitstop...The moment that was done?
He was going to go get his lass.

Chapter Seven



Ronan was watching Scarlett like she was a juicy snack. Which in some regards, she was. None of the vampires there held the power that Scarlett possessed just under the surface. The vampires did not meddle with magic around those parts, so they did not truly know the error of their ways, and how powerful it really was. They did not know what power they had just within their grasp, and how it could better their lives in the long run. No one would suspect Ronan was using stolen magic to fuel his reign. They would not follow him blindly, it had always been a struggle. But with the influence of power he slowly and surely had been obtaining, they did so willingly.
At least for a little while, until it wore out. That was where Scarlett came in.
He had always longed to have the power the magic users possessed, and it had taken countless gold to ensure the guards that saw Scarlett kept their silence. He had found just the witch to help. All it had taken was a little threatening and a little bit of family leverage for her to be at his beck and call. Hidden away, the witch would use her power to drain Scarlett of her own. Bit-by-bit the girl would die until she was no longer a threat. It was power that complimented the vampires, power that worked with their bloodline. While Ronan grew stronger and stronger, Scarlett would fade away. In the end, it would all take care of itself.
But first, he had to make sure she didn’t break free of the remaining drugs in her system and blow him out of his office.
“Ya must be thirsty. I know you’ll no’ take a drink from me. Smart lass.” His voice was low, green eyes fixed on Scarlett as the door to his office opened and one of his guards entered, a needle in hand. A little treat for Scarlett.
Scarlett stared ahead at her uncle, dark brown eyes boring into him as her teeth ground together. If there was anything she wanted to do, it was smack the smug look off his face. He had bested her, finally found a way to grab her, and the worst part? It was entirely her fault.
Had she just stayed with Gordon...hell, if she had just stayed home, back in New York, none of this would have ever happened. She wouldn’t be cuffed in the Scottish castle, she’d be safe with her family. But that stubborn female just had to seek out adventure and see the world. How foolish to believe she was safe.
“I’ll die before I take anything from you or anyone in this damned castle.” She spat, those words laced with venom.
The second those drugs wore off even a little bit, she was going to rip that man to pieces. “I don’t want your throne. I don’t want to rule. Draw up some documents, whatever you need to do and let me sign away my right to the throne. I don’t want any of this. I want to go home. To my real family.”
“Aye. That’s the thing. There will be no going home for ye. You’re never getting the throne even if ye wanted it. Yer here because your blood is mixed with magic. It compliments it. I want that power. We’ve got a lass who will be pulling it from ye. We...tried with magic users and the results were…”
“I don’t really care what the results were. I’m not taking your damn throne and you’re not taking my magic. Send me home. Where I belong.”
He reached for his arm, pulling up the sleeve of the collared shirt he wore. The skin was darkened and black above his wrist. There was a jagged and dead design that had destroyed the skin of his forearm. “If I want power, I need what ye have, Scarlett. A magic mah blood can take. When it’s all mine? You’ll be set free.” Free to the Heavens, more so.
The guard moved up behind Scarlett, quick as lightning the needle was buried into her neck, the sedative released. It was not enough to knock her out - he needed her conscious. But it would keep her power at bay until the witch Gwendoline pulled it from her.
Scarlett jerked back with a yelp, not fast enough to get away from the needle and the god awful cocktail that was mixed up in it. More drugs. More fog. Fuck, that was really getting old. How much longer were they going to keep this up for?
“Yer a gift to me, Scarlett. Yer parents blessed you with that mix of blood and now it will be mine. This has never been about the throne, or you would have been dead long ago when that waste o’ a gang had ye.”
“What makes you think my magic will be compatible? That’s from my mother. Not your brother. I hope it kills you, truly I do.”
“It has already mixed with yer vampire blood. That’s all I need.” His eyes were narrowed, a small smile on his face as he observed her. “Bite. You’ve got it. But tha won’t help you here, lass.” He moved around the desk, not stopping until he was right in front of her, eyes unblinking as he watched her.
“I’ll have the magic. Until then? Take her out of ma sight.” He was a mere few inches from her face, his sinister grin blatantly mocking her.
The guard behind her moved to grasp Scarlett. She watched her uncle as he moved like a shark, circling her like some piece of prey. When he was in striking distance, she spit, aiming right for his face. The second her saliva was free from her mouth, a growl filled the space.
“Fuck. You.”
Ronan was swatting at his face and trying to rid it of her saliva. His face twisted in rage as he moved forward, one hand lashing out to slap Scarlett hard across the face. “Get her outta’ here.” He hissed, hand finding some of her spit he had not been able to remove.
When the guard drug Scarlett out of the room, Ronan was dry-heaving in his office.
The massive vampire moved swiftly down the hallway, leading her through the back of the castle and lower...deeper...into the depths and hidden away from prying eyes. Scarlett thrashed against the vampire’s hold at first, but once they were clear of the office and heading down the halls, her kicking and squirming ceased.
She may have been stupid enough to get herself captured, but she wasn’t stupid enough to not pay attention to a possible escape route. She noted every step they took, every turn down the hallways. She burned it into her memory, even as the drugs washed over her and put her in that cloudy space.
“They’ll find me, you know. My real family. They’re going to find me and when they do, they’re going to kill all you useless sacks of shit.”
At first, the guard was silent, not stopping his trek until he reached the top of a set of stone stairs. Glancing at her for a moment, he shook his head and led her down into the darkness. At the bottom there was a door that locked from the outside. Her new, temporary home until she died. Unlocking the room, he gave her a little nudge inside and uncuffed her. There was a simple bed, a dresser of clothing, and a fridge full of food. There would be no room service for her, the door would only be opened when Gwen came to take care of her.
His dark, almost black eyes watched her for a moment before the door was closed and the locks secured. He peeked through the slot above, watching her inside, finally speaking.
“Fer yer sake, lass. I hope so.”

Chapter Eight



Scarlett had spent all day trying to find any kind of weakness in the doors, the walls, and the bar covered windows. There was none. The only way she was getting out of there, was if they stopped drugging her and she could blast the door open, or if someone let her out. Neither of those options seemed to be in the cards.
With a sigh, she abandoned her structural investigation and moved to the mini fridge. Opening it, she peeked inside. On the bright side, it was stocked full of food. Good food. The downfall? She was confident everything in there was drugged. Or at least most of it. Against her better judgement, she grabbed a bottle of iced tea and turned to face her new digs. How long could someone be alone before they went absolutely mad?
She gave up on the answer to that question quickly and headed over to the bed across the room, crawling up onto it. Her head hit the pillow, eyes closing as her body curled up into a fetal position. There was no point in getting under the covers, no need to get too comfortable. But the drugs? They were taking their toll. It was like having the flu without the fever and the body pains. She was exhausted, bone-tired with a migraine that rivaled any she had in the past.
Before she knew it, she was fast asleep, surrendering to the power of the sedative; blissfully unaware of the guard slipping into the room and injecting her with another dose of the powerful drug. By the time she had woken up, the sun was shining through the window.
Scarlett’s eyes opened and immediately she winced. It was too bright, way, way too bright. With a groan, she rolled onto her side and shoved her face back into the pillow. With any luck, the pounding in her skull would stop. That alone was enough to make her promise she wouldn’t use her magic if they just lightened the dose. Yeah, fat chance of that happening.
There was a sound at Scarlett’s door as it was unlocked, swinging outward before a small shape slipped inside. The power the guest possessed pressed against each corner of her cell, a soft breathing in the air that tickled along the skin.
Gwendoline didn’t look like much, but there was a reason she had been chosen to assist. Well...forced to assist. Ronan had threatened her family and she knew better than to question a vampire King. No matter how twisted the situation. There was a reason the magic users around those parts wanted nothing to do with those nasty bloodsuckers. Now she was working for the biggest one. Not that she was trusted; guards lined the hallway outside the cell, prepared just in case anything went wrong.
With a soft sigh, Gwen’s arms crossed over her chest, slate grey eyes on Scarlett. Unfeeling. Forcing herself to not care for the girl before her. She couldn’t. If she failed her mission her family would die.
Her short black hair was chopped around her tiny face, making her look much younger than she truly was. “I’m Gwen. No’ that it matters.”
Scarlett dragged herself into a sitting position, eyes on the woman before her. She was a tiny little thing, nothing she was afraid of. “You know you don’t have to do this. With me being back in Scotland, I’m technically the Queen, am I not?” She shifted slightly, legs swinging over the side of the bed. “Whatever my uncle has on you...I’ll fix it.”
Gwen’s eyes were on Scarlett’s legs, body fixed to move if the Queen started towards her. “Ye vamps are always the same. Promisin’, payin’. In the end, ma family is dead.” She shrugged but the pain flashed over her eyes for a small moment.
Curse her blood, curse her powers. She had thought it would benefit her someday to study tirelessly and learn as much magic as she could. In the end? Her extra power had put her in a perfect position to get harmed.
“I’m not my uncle.” Scarlett spoke softly. “Where I’m from? My family saves people. We don’t harm them unless they’re hurting the innocents. If my family can send teams here...they can save your family too. My uncle wouldn’t be able to get to them in time if he doesn’t know they’re coming.” She was attempting to plead with this woman, knowing it was her only shot.
“It will be over soon. Just a little test today.” Gwen murmured, her small hands falling to her side.
There was a glow that matched her eyes, slate grey, misting from her fingertips. But she did not yet point them at Scarlett. “I can take some o’ the drugs out of yer system. But that’s all. If ye’ escape yer highness, it’s on ye. But he needs ta make sure this works.” Gwen sighed, shaking her head the moment the words left her mouth. Was she really going to help her? She owed Scarlett nothing but...there was a vibe there. An air of innocence and power that Gwen could not ignore. One she had to help, if only a small bit. Her family...
“Are you taking all of my magic?” Scarlett asked point blank, stomach flip-flopping like she was about to vomit.
“No. No’ yet. Just a taste.” Her voice was monotone, eyes fixed on Scarlett’s legs before she let out a breath of air.
Without wasting another second, her hands pointed at Scarlett, the incantation low on her breath as she worked her magic. It snaked through the air, wrapping around her ankles and wrists as it held her still. Another blast of magic came from her mouth, hitting Scarlett in the chest, pulling her magic from her.
There were so many questions Scarlett wanted to ask, like why she would pull the drugs from her system if she wasn’t draining her power. But before she could say a word Gwen’s power lashed out and grabbed a hold of her. Her body went stiff, eyes wide in sheer panic as she felt the pull of the magic.
She wanted to scream, wanted to yell out for it to stop. The dull burn from Gwen’s magic got hotter and hotter and slowly, she felt a piece of herself leaving. No, no, no, this couldn’t be possible.
Gwen continued to speak, stopping a few moments later. In her outstretched hand there was a ball of power, a bit of what she had taken. What she would put into the King as he demanded. Slowly that grey power released Scarlett and returned to Gwendoline.
“I’m sorry.” The words were barely heard as she looked down at the power in her hand.
Her free palm pushed towards Scarlett, the grey power racing towards her once more. But this time it didn’t take more magic, instead it reached for the drugs in her body, taking them from her. Even if it was just a few hours of clarity, Gwen could not leave her with nothing. Besides, if the King questioned why her power was back? She’d claim it was a side effect of the pull. It would not endanger her family.
She raced from the room a second later, not allowing herself to be exposed when Scarlett was given her power back. What remained of it.
Behind Gwen, the door was locked, guards back in place.
Scarlett’s head cleared for the first time in...days? Fuck, how long had she been gone for? She felt the clarity. The fog was gone from her mind. She blinked, stumbling backward toward the bed. She dropped down to the mattress, hands on her knees as she stared ahead. Her body hurt like hell.
Scarlett swallowed a growl, eyes bleeding black as her eyes pinned on the door. She waited for the next guard to come in with one of those needles. She would make them pay. Make them suffer.
Scarlett’s hands shook gently as she shifted to rest them in her lap, fangs elongating. Where oh where was her prey? She was ready to bust out of this joint.

Chapter Nine



Brodie stared upward at the castle before him. Being back there after what he had just experienced and knowing what he was going to do? It gave it an eerie feeling, casting darkness across the once familiar stones.
He had stopped at home, packing all the necessary tools needed to make this as flawless as possible. There were only a few places the King would keep her locked away, and only one that was forbidden from all guards. Brodie was sure he’d still have close ones keeping watch, but it was nothing he couldn’t handle. Compared to the Keepers of the City, the Scotland vampires were far from tech savvy. They relied on the keen sense of smell and speed to keep watch over the grounds, but there were no cameras.
With all the bullshit going around, Brodie knew it was probably for the best. The King had enough secrets to fill the castle, and then some.
The best part of it all? As long as he didn’t run into the King, his main guards, or Victoria...no one would think he was out of place. Which really was a blessing seeing as there was no way into the castle without the guards catching sight of him. Which still left the question of how he was going to get Scarlett out once he got his hands on her. It wasn’t like she had her power available and could blast them out. Maybe the Goddess would send another hand down and assist. Something told Brodie that was a long shot.
Ah hell, it was a good thing he was great at thinking on his feet.
Brodie strolled up to the front of the castle, catching no sight of Victoria or Leon anywhere on the grounds. He gave the guards a sweeping bow and nod, letting out a breath of air he didn’t realize he had been holding when neither gave him a second glance. But that was the easy part.
The moment Brodie entered the castle he took a strong left, tucking himself against the wall and slipping into the darkness. Sure, he was surrounded by vampires, but he had practiced for a century, knew how to become the darkness and use it to his advantage. He knew how to move fast enough to slip by without others even catching his scent. It had been how he got close to Scarlett in the first place, how he had obtained a position beneath the King. Now it was being used to betray both himself and Ronan.
He was making his way towards the back east side of the castle when he heard Victoria’s voice and froze, holding his breath as she stormed by, Leon close behind her.
“Why do’ it even matter, huh? So what he’s dead...tha girl is here, he got what he wanted. I just want to get paid and drink.” Leon grumbled something behind her, barely keeping up as she booked it towards the front foyer.
But then she paused, a quizzical look crossing her face as she sniffed the air. Brodie was pressed against the wall behind a large vase in the corner, praying with everything he could that she did not catch his scent and find him. But Victoria shook her head, throwing a few more curses to the wind before leaving the hallway with Leon.
Brodie continued on, tucking himself around the corner and down towards the forbidden wing and the stone steps that would lead to Scarlett. His body felt strong and practiced, powerful with the blessing of the Heavens. Soon enough he stood at the threshold of the hallway and staircase. Below, the voices of two guards caught his attention.
He made his way down the stairs, hand grabbing for his gun and the silencer at his side. Both guards turned to face him the moment he reached them, but before they had a chance to say a word he had fired twice, the sound muted as each bullet hit its target. They fell to the ground, dead before they hit it. Normally he preferred his knives, but he needed to make sure the job was done and the guards didn’t get back up.
Brodie went straight for the door to Scarlett’s room, using the sleeve of his shirt to unlock her door, wiping away the blood from his victims in the process. He opened the door, hands out as he bowed low.
“Aye, yer highness. I’m here ta save...FUCK!” He yelled out as his entire body was blasted backwards, slamming into the wall.
Scarlett had been waiting, perched on the edge of the bed and ready to strike. She heard the commotion outside of the door and a low growl escaped her. Her fangs ached to dig into something, to rip at flesh. She felt like a rabid dog.
She leapt off the bed and stalked toward the door, only to recognize Brodie as the one she had just thrown into the wall. She blinked, eyes shifting back to their normal brown. Her fangs were still elongated, fingers still glowing as her power slipped toward him and caressed his neck. She didn’t choke him, simply let him feel her strength there. “Why the fuck are you here? You should be dead.” Was she seeing things? Were the drugs making her believe Brodie was there?
He growled, fangs elongating and eyes bleeding black as his hands scratched towards the magic at his throat. One hand abandoned his neck, pointing at the dead bodies at her feet. “To...save... Let’s go…” He could feel her power pressing through him, cascading down his arms.
It was so powerful, nothing like what he had felt before when near her. He both hated it and wanted more. But clearly that was the hit of his head against the wall speaking for him.
“Brodie, it’s sooo good...tah see ye alive and well…” He said in a high voice, eyes rolling.
Scarlett’s magic dropped from his throat, her power falling away with a woosh. “Brodie, it’s soooo good to see you alive and well...thanks for getting me into this mess in the first place.” She snapped back.
Taking a step backwards, she kept her eyes pinned on him. “Why should I believe you’re here to save me now? You were going to bring me in like a pig to slaughter. What are you going to do with me? How are you even alive?” She was firing off question after question, hands quivering as they fought to keep her magic at bay.
He sighed, shoulders adjusting as her magic left him. Shaking his head, Brodie remembered the promise he had made the Goddess. “I had some divine intervention and I have ta save ye. Just...pretend it’s to spite Vic. No more questions, cummon.” He was moving quickly, then, body racing towards the stone steps.
Brodie paused, glancing over his shoulder to see if Scarlett was coming. “How...did ye get the power back?” He was dealing with an atom bomb and suddenly not quite the powerful one of them both. Used to being in that position, he wasn’t certain he liked the change of events.
Scarlett’s fingers twitched and for a brief second as she contemplated delivering one hell of a bitch slap with her magic. But she refrained...for the time being. “A witch. She took...she took a part of me, my power...but she took away the drugs too.” Scarlett swallowed.
That witch’s family was going to be slaughtered if she didn’t do something to stop it. Unable to think about that, she bolted for the door, stepping over the dead bodies as she followed Brodie. “So, what...you think we’re just going to walk right out the front door?”
Without waiting for him to answer, a surge of magic spiked around them, covering them in a bubble-like force. “Good thing I’m quite talented with wards. Don’t touch anything.” She snapped. “Show me the way.”
Brodie froze when her ward fell over them, comforted with the use of magic he had not banked on before. The magic that would get them out of there alive and without casualty. But being surrounded by it? The one thing he had learned to hate from the moment it took away his parents? It was nerve racking. Alive...they were going to get out of there alive. He just needed to focus on that.
Without another word, he took a few steps forward, the bubble of magic following him. Once he was certain he wasn’t going to break through it or touch it, Brodie’s speed quickened, taking the steps two at a time as he made his way back up and into the hallway.
Scarlett followed closely, still half tempted to stop long enough to take a swing at the male. She would get her shot as soon as they were out of the damn castle. “He’s going to kill the witch’s family.” She murmured. “We have to stop him.”
She went silent as they rounded a corner and came to one of the main parts of the castle. Glancing over at Brodie, she looked to him to guide them through the warzone.
“We? Yer highness...I’m takin’ ye out of here and ta yer parents. That’s it. Why are ye worried about the witch…” But he stopped, shaking his head.
One hand moved to his forehead, rubbing the skin there before pulling his hand through his hair to the back of his scalp and the sore spot that had hit the wall.
“Because the witch gave me my magic back.” She whispered angrily.
“Fine. Fine lass. I’m a dead man at some point, anyway.” He froze then, one hand flying back to stop her body as several guards rounded the corner.
Brodie took a few steps back, body flush with the front of hers as he pushed them out of the way. Behind the guards? Ronan stalked onward. Scarlett opened her mouth, quickly snapping it shut when she saw Ronan crossing the front foyer. He body went stiff against Brodie, a slight tremor quaking through her as her eyes followed her uncle. She wanted to rip him apart, but her common sense won out.
This place, though low in tech security, had plenty of guards. She would be dead in seconds despite being the rightful Queen. Brown eyes narrowed as she bit back a hiss, hands moving to her sides. If she made further contact with Brodie, she would hurt him accidentally.
Thankfully, her uncle and the guards rounded the corner, heading towards where she had been kept. They had to leave, and fast. It was only a matter of seconds before the King realized she wasn’t there and locked everything down.
“Run.” His whisper was soft, pointing towards the hallway that led to the front of the castle.
It was right there, in their grasp. Just a few hundred feet and they would be at the front door...headed for the courtyard…
Then what? Didn’t matter. He could feel the power of her uncle behind them and down the hallway.
Power?
Brodie blinked, shaking the thought from his mind. If the King had some sort of power he didn’t before, it was even more reason for them to get the hell out of there. He grabbed for the door, taking a deep breath to open it and secure their safety.
With a smash, the door swung open and he was knocked backwards towards Scarlett and the ground. Leon storming into the castle with Victoria close behind. “We need ta speak with…” But she stopped speaking, eyes wide as she stared at the space Brodie and Scarlett had fallen.
Brodie blinked, looking down at himself. The ward had fallen.
Fuck.
“You...you’re supposed ta be dead…” Victoria spat.
Scarlett jumped to her feet, eyes bleeding black as she snarled. “Way to fuck that up, Slick.” She growled at Brodie.
Before Victoria or Leon could register what was happening, Scarlett lashed out. She wasn’t drugged or cuffed, it was her turn for a little payback.  The gold smoke snaked through the air. One bolt secured around Victoria’s throat, the other blasted into Leon. “Payback is a real bitch, Vicky.”
Scarlett started forward, blind to the guards around her, her focused rage on the redhead and the redhead alone. Pulling her toward her as her body moved closer, she snarled, upper lip pulling back to reveal her fangs. “Brodie, get up.” Scar finally turned her gaze to those around them, her power closing off Victoria’s air supply.
Brodie jumped up, hand reaching for a throwing knife at his side the moment Leon stirred from his position on the ground where Scarlett’s power had launched him. It embedded itself in the man’s leg, knocking him back to the ground the moment he tried to stand.
“Any of you come near me, I kill her on the spot. For those that don’t know? I’m your Queen. The rightful heir to this place. I suggest you think long and hard about what you’re about to do before you do it. Your ‘king’ might have some newfound power, but I promise it’s nothing compared to what I still have.” But what the witch had done had drained her and she wasn’t entirely sure how long she could keep up the show.
Black eyes shifted to Victoria before glancing behind her at Leon. Her hand lifted, magic threatening to slam him back to the floor again. “Ah ah, I wouldn’t if I were you. You stay put on the floor. I’m sure Brodie has another one of those knives tucked away.”
“Aye. Although tis ma favorite.” Brodie walked over to Leon, leaning down and ripping the knife from the meat of the man’s leg before he had a chance to stop him.
Leon howled, grabbing for it as his fangs elongated, snarling at them. But he didn’t move from his position on the floor.
Brodie walked to Scarlett, eyes on Victoria. She was breathing heavily, eyes wide and bulging as she tried to wrap her crazy head around what was happening. “Ello love.” He said with a smirk, eyes to the guards frozen in place behind her, blocking their way to freedom.
They moved when Scarlett, Victoria and Brodie approached, the female vampire being used as a perfect way out. At least until it clicked that she didn’t matter and the King would kill them all to get Scarlett.
They were on borrowed time...seconds.
“Pleasure being with ye all. Time for us ta take our leave.” Brodie murmured, pushing forward suddenly. “Scarlett, WARD!” He couldn’t believe he was begging for that magic. One of the guards had pulled the gun at his side, the other moving with lightning speed towards them.
In a blink, Scarlett sent Victoria flying forward with a shove. In the next second, she brought up a ward around her and Brodie, protecting them from bullets. “Let’s go.” She murmured, heading toward the forest.
There was only so long she could keep the ward up for… “Tell me you have a car somewhere?” She slowed as they reached the wood line, stumbling slightly. “Brodie…”
His arms were under her a second later, lifting her up and into his arms as he ran, that superhuman speed propelling him into the woods and the darkness the large branches around them cast. The ward fell the moment he scooped her up.
He was sprinting faster than ever before, not stopping until he saw the dark outline of his car, just a few yards away from the dirt road and clearing.
Brodie leaned down, opening the passenger side before he carefully put Scarlett inside, running to his side of the car.
When they pulled out onto the dirt road, tires kicking up dust as they sped off, he peered back in his rearview mirror. Behind them, Victoria had broken through the trees, her hands in the air as she screamed at the car racing away.
Scarlett was barely aware of what was going on around them, body giving into the exhaustion. All of her magic drained at once as she slumped against the car seat, eyes closing. “Brodie…” His name was the last thing on her lips as she slipped into the darkness.

Chapter Ten



Scarlett groaned and rolled onto her back, keeping her eyes squeezed shut. Her body hurt, her head hurt but she still felt...clear. She was thinking with a level head.
One eye opened, then the other. When she took in her surroundings, she frowned. Where the hell was she? This certainly was not the stone walled room she had been stuffed into at the castle. Perhaps...perhaps this wasn’t a dream after all. Slowly, she sat up and looked around, sniffing at the air.
Brodie.
His scent was all over everything. A quiet growl escaped her as she yanked the blanket back and hopped out of the bed. Her hand shot out to steady herself on the nightstand. In the room next to her, she could hear the sound of running water. The shower.
With a huff, she pushed off the nightstand and headed toward the bathroom door. She tested the handle, growled when she found it locked. Her magic snaked out and into the lock, popping it easily. Scarlett barged into the bathroom, grabbing the shower curtain and ripping it open.
“You son of a bitch.”
Brodie didn’t even bother covering himself up. He had heard her wake up in the other room but had not expected her to break into the bathroom. Even when the lock had clicked. Still, knowing she was there, it had scared the living shit out of him.
“If ye wanted to come in, there are better ways.” He grumbled, leaning his hip against the wall and crossing his tattooed arms over his chest. But with that look on her face? He wasn’t halfway convinced she didn’t have murder on the mind.
“Also, lass. I saved ye. Sure it was after I screwed ye over but…”
“Oh? Better ways, eh?” Scarlett growled, half tempted to strip and jump into the shower with him.
But she didn’t strip. She did, however, step into the shower. She closed the distance between them, coming toe-to-toe with the significantly larger male. Ignoring the wet that was soaking her clothes, her hand came up and her finger jabbed into the center of his chest. “You took me. You were going to deliver me there and serve me up on a silver platter, dickhead. So don’t pull this savior bullshit on me now. You only saved me to save your own life.” Selfish, Brodie was selfish.
There was no possible way Brodie was going to own up to enjoying any part of Scarlett. He had been intrigued by her the moment he started studying her family, had started to regret and second guess the position he held long before his body broke against the waves of the Atlantic.
It was stupid to want Scarlett at all. Stupid to look at her...fully clothed in the shower, dark eyes glaring up at him...and actually be in any way aroused. But that’s what the little mixed blood woman did. She aroused his damn mind.
“So. What?” He said then, his own eyes narrowing. “Yer safe now and I’m no’ stopping until yer with kin.” He didn’t move away from her body, instead took a step closer and pushed their bodies together; the muscles of his own pressed against the wet fabric on her.
Not even blinking as the water hit them both. Paying attention to the beating of her heart in his ear, watching her. When was the last time she had fed?
“So. What?” He repeated.
Scarlett swallowed when his toned body pressed up against her. She had admitted he was attractive when she first saw him, but his wet, naked body against hers? Fucking hell. “I don’t need your help getting home.” She shot back.
But her words shook slightly, her mind too busy with the thundering sound of his heart beat, the pulse of the vein at his throat. “Why? Why did you come back for me knowing you could die? You wanted me dead. Don’t feed me some bullshit about a divine intervention.”
“Look at ma body, lass. No vampire is strong enough to heal as I have. Divine intervention...and I do’ need to tell ya more.”
Her hands came up and shoved at his chest, trying to push him away from her. But it was like trying to move a boulder. Without thinking, her arm cocked back, fist aiming for his face as she struck. Victoria and Leon weren’t the only ones that deserved a little bit of her wrath.
His eyes bled black, fangs elongating as his hand darted up and grabbed her fist a mere inch away from his face, tightening around her hand. Brodie growled, the sound vibrating up through his chest as his free hand grabbed onto her hip, holding her against him as his head tilted downward. Before Brodie had a chance to register his movements his lips were against Scarlett’s.
One second Scarlett was trying to marr that pretty face of his and the next her lips were on his. And she wasn’t pushing him away that time. Scarlett met that kiss with a growl but she kissed him back, free hand coming up to rest on his chest.
There was nothing soft about the kiss, nothing gentle about their needy lips against each other. The moment Brodie felt the contact, her magic seemed to dance along his skin, his anger for it mixed with the pleasure it caused. Losing himself to it, to Scarlett.
His hands went to the bottom of her wet shirt, pulling it up her body and allowing it to fall to the floor of the shower. Scarlett broke the kiss to let him strip the shirt from her body and once he got it off, her hands moved to her pants, shoving them down over her hips. It took her seconds to wiggle out of them and as soon as she was free of them, she looked back up at Brodie.
Scarlett’s breath hitched, taking a moment to think about what she was doing before her lips sought his out once more.
His eyes were scanning down her body, taking all of her in. Every delicious curve, every bit of her that he had tried not to think about during that entire mission. Now it was there, pressed against him while the warm shower fell over them. When her lips hit his again, Brodie’s fangs scraped against them, the one drop of blood enough to make him lose all control immediately. He growled once more, hands lowering down her body, cupping her ass as he lifted Scarlett upward, urging her legs around him.
Scarlett let out a moan, the sharp pinch from his fangs enough to send her self-control spiraling. When Brodie lifted her, her legs wrapped around his waist, her arms moved to drape around his neck to steady herself.
Dipping down, her lips found his neck, tongue gliding up along his vein. “Let me feed.” She growled, teasingly scraping her fangs against his skin.
“Please.” She softened that demand.
It was completely normal for vampires to casually feed from each other, knowing it was the best way to regain their strength, something they needed to survive. But it was beyond intimate, beyond what Brodie could explain. His body hard, needing to be buried inside her while she took from his vein; the scene playing out in his mind. Completely and utterly under her spell.
The true Queen of their kind...and she was asking to feed from him. Despite feeling dirty...bad beneath her fingertips...he was not going to tell her no.
“Bite.”
Scarlett struck without hesitation, her fangs sinking into his neck. The moment his blood flowed over her tongue she let out a moan, nails digging into his back as she pulled from him. He was delicious. Damn delicious. And that blood? Better than any alcohol she had ever tasted. Her growl vibrated against him as she bit down, fangs sinking deeper.
He couldn’t stop, couldn’t control his need, barely able to see past the waves of pleasure surging through his body. Brodie was positioned at her wet entrance, lowering her body onto his hard length inch-by-inch. He groaned, stopping the moment he was buried inside her body. She was so tight, clenching onto him, her fangs buried in his neck and pulling everything he had to offer, her magic enhancing every single sensation. For a brief second he just stood there and felt her, but quickly began moving her body up and down his shaft.
Another moan escaped her as she forced herself to pull away. If she kept feeding from him, she was going to hurt him. Scarlett’s tongue struck out, sealing the wounds on his neck as she groaned. She wanted more of that, more of him.
She focused on the sensation of him filling her a moment later, rush she got from feeding. “Fuck, Brodie!” His name came out as a breathy gasp before she leaned in and kissed him again.
He loved the sound of his name on her lips, her legs wrapped around him as he turned around, pushing her back against the wall of the shower as he thrust in and out of her body. The feeding alone had brought him so terribly close to orgasm but there was no way he was going to let it end that quickly.
He held on tighter, working his body in and out of her, mouth at her throat and collarbone, not biting. Just...enjoying the feel of her smooth skin beneath his lips. He growled, body building that orgasm he knew he wouldn’t be able to hold for long. “Close…” He managed out, body unable to fight what he knew would happen a moment later.
Her hand moved off his back, moving up to his hair as she tangled her fingers in it. Scarlett guided him back to her throat, swallowing nervously before she spoke. “Bite, Brodie. Bite.” Her lip quivered, body shaking with anticipation.
She was offering to have him bite, to taste the blood of the rightful Queen of their clan. Brodie growled, lips at her throat as he fought against his need, the uncontrollable need to bury his fangs in Scarlett. But he didn’t, shaking his head against her as he lowered his kisses to her breast, sucking her nipple. Needing to feel her cum around him before he released.
His denial was met with a growl, her fingers tugging at his hair even as his kisses moved down to capture her breast. Her head tipped back, her moan filling the space around them. But that tug turned into a sharp yank, forcing his mouth from her breast. “I said bite.” She growled out, fighting back her own orgasm.
She wanted to feel his fangs buried in her neck, wanted to hear his moan when her blood hit his tongue. “Now, Brodie.”
Oh fuck…
Brodie growled, the softest smile on his lips as he felt that rank pushed on him. A second later he bit down, breaking her skin and allowing her royal, magical blood to fill his mouth. It was unlike anything he had ever tasted before, the sweetest meal he had ever had in his life.
Brodie could not control his orgasm, his thrusting intensifying as he came hard inside Scarlett. Experiencing the best sex of his life in the shower with his Queen. Scarlett’s moans got louder when he obeyed her demand, the sharp pain of his fangs piercing her skin and sending a shockwave of pleasure through her.
Just like Brodie, she couldn’t hold back her orgasm. His name rolled off her tongue as a growl as she shattered around him. “Ah, fuck, Brodie.” She gasped, hardly able to catch her breath as he filled her.
“Scarlett…” He had released his hold on her neck, her name said in a murmur against her skin as he sealed the wound.
Brodie rested then, still holding her up in his arms and against the wall, the cold water hitting them in waves as he moved up and rested his forehead against hers. A soft sigh escaped her as she leaned against him, simply holding onto him. He was right, he had saved her. She was alive because of him… “Brodie…” But the words fell flat.
Slowly, he left her body, lowering Scarlett to the shower floor.
What the fuck had they just done?
When her feet hit the cool tile, Scarlett peered up at him. Nipping her lower lip, she fought for the right words, the sting from his fangs still fresh on her neck. “I...I’m going to go make a coffee. I’ll make you one too.” She was still pissed, still had things she needed to work out with him, but that sex?
Sparing one more glance at him, she slipped out of the shower and back into the hotel room. Closing the bathroom door behind her, she leaned against it and closed her eyes, fighting to catch her breath.
“Fuck.”

Chapter Eleven



Brodie remained in the bathroom for a bit after Scarlett left. When he returned, it was as if nothing had happened between them. He was dressed in black, his knives secured back at his side, rings back on every finger as he made his way into the bedroom; although he was continuing to twist them, unable to stop himself as he lounged back on the bed, trying to ignore how badly he wanted to get his hands back on Scarlett.
“Thank ye for tha coffee, lass.” He said then, grabbing onto the cup she had placed on the side table next to him after he left the bathroom. Taking a drink, Brodie finally looked over to her, dark eyes searching her face.
“This is a small inn downtown, they’ll get er’ soon. It’s only a matter of time before they hunt down ma aliases. Especially with Vic. Ma cards will only be good fer so long. But until then…” He reached for the phone, lazily waving it at her. “I think ye have a call to make.”
Scarlett kept her eyes on him when he returned to the main room, watching him like a hawk. She had dressed almost as soon as she had gotten brave enough to leave the wall, thankful he had gotten her a few things to wear. How he did it, she had no idea. “Thanks for the help.” This time, those words didn’t taste so bitter when she said them.
Scooching back on the bed, she shifted slightly to face him. Scarlett took the phone but didn’t immediately make the phone call he was talking about. “I forgive you for what you did...for taking me. And you and I? We’re going to have a conversation as soon as I hang up this phone.” Without waiting for him to reply, she dialed her mother’s number and waited for her to pick up.
Her mother answered on the fourth ring. “Hello?” She sounded so...broken. Defeated.
“Hey Mama.” Scarlett smiled. “I’m okay. I’m safe.”
“Scarlett? Where are you?!” She could hear Millie moving around the house, probably seeking out her Dads, Jax and Julian.
“Scotland. I was taken but I got away from my uncle. Listen, I can’t talk long but I need you guys to do a few things. I need some teams sent out here, some of our best. And I need access to some credit cards under different names as soon as possible. I need to stay hidden for a bit..”
“Where are you? We’ll send Gordon immediately, we’ll come to you. Come home...I’ll book th-”
Scarlett cut her off. “No, Mom. No. Listen to me. I’m not coming home yet. My uncle? I met him, he’s worse than the High Moon Gang ever was and he needs to be taken down. I need help doing that.. I need you to trust me.”
“Scarlett!” She could hear the anger in her mother’s voice but a moment later, her dad’s voice came on the line.
“We’ve got your back, baby. I’m glad you’re safe.” Jax’s deep voice was calm, collected. “We’ll talk to Derek and get a team there at once. How did you get away? Are you hurt?” There was a voice in the background, Julian’s.
“Who are we fucking killing?”
“No one right now, Julian. Shut up a second.” Jax murmured, and his side went silent. “You were saying, Scar?”
“Thank you, Dad. I’m not hurt, I’m safe I promise. I told mom I need access to one of the back-up cards, the ones we keep with fake names. I need to find a place to stay here for a bit. I had...help getting out. Someone on my side. He’s with me, he’s keeping me safe.” She wasn’t going to admit he was the one that took her in the first place...
There was silence on the other end of the line for a moment, then Jax cleared his throat. “We are glad you’re safe. We’ll get you that information soon. I’ll get this number from you and call back as soon as we have a team dispatched and the card numbers. I love you...we love you.”
“Okay, I love you. Tell Mom and Julian I love them too.” Scar reluctantly hung up the phone and passed it to Brodie. “They don’t need to know anything.”
He was watching her, dark eyes studying during the entire talk. He reached out and grabbed the phone, placing it back on the stand before leaning back on the bed. “Surprised ye didn’t tell em.” Surprised she had said she forgave him. Scarlett was perplexing to him and Brodie was enjoying every moment of it.
“Yer pretty close with them all.” He said then, taking a drink of his black coffee. “Surprised me when I first started watching ye.”
“I should tell them...I should tell them everything and let them deal with you.” But she couldn’t.
“Surprised I’m close with my family? Those are my parents...my siblings. Callie and Jake? I’m close with them too. And their families. We’re all a tight-knit community. Just how my clan works.” She paused, eyes on him. “How long have you been watching me?”
“Six months.” He said.
Closely, too. He knew as much as he could about Scarlett and still she was surprising him. It was frustrating. Brodie was spinning a silver ring on his middle finger, face amused. “‘Nuff to know ye hate just about everywhere ye travel ta. Wanderlust? Thought it would be a good time ta bring ye to Scotland. It’s a travelers must go.”
Scarlett rolled her eyes. “And what makes you think I hate traveling? I love it. Love finding new places.” No she didn’t, she wanted to go home and be with her family but she had a point to prove.
Reaching forward, Scarlett took one of his hands, examining his rings. “What are these for?”
He let her take his hand, eyes unwavering as he watched her. “Nervous tick. Ma Mum gave them ta me when I was young. Spin them when ma mind is racing.” He had nothing to lose in answering honestly.
His honesty used to be something his mother and father praised him for when he was a child. Of course, thinking of them never did him any good, anymore.
Scarlett’s thumb ran over the back of his hand as she looked at his tattoos. She was torn between two questions. “I’m going to ask you two questions, then you can ask me two. What do all these tattoos mean and what happened to your parents? Your face when you talk about your mother…” It was sadness there…
He was quiet for a moment, before sighing, “Tha tattoos feel nice. They’re clan related and I’m ‘fraid I’m hooked. Na much more of a story there. As for ma parents? Killed. Magic users. Not tha biggest fan.” He murmured, eyes lowering to her hand on his. At first, he had wanted to whip it away, not welcoming the now familiar breeze of her power over his skin.
Now? He was so tempted by it, keeping his hand in hers. Clearing his throat, he asked two questions before she had a chance to speak. “Are ye really plannin’ on killing Ronan? Who’s gonnae take care of the clan, then? No’ that he’s much of a King.” Brodie shrugged, “Wha does it feel like? Having...magic?”
Scarlett slowly moved her hand away, dropping it to her lap after she murmured a quiet ‘sorry.’ “That was three questions.” She pointed out.
“I am. Someone has to, and apparently no one in this country has the balls to do it. Don’t know who is going to take over the clan. Maybe I’ll stay. Take my birthright.” She shrugged, then mulled over his question about magic.
“Makes me feel safer. I...you know all about the kidnapping and attempting kidnapping when I was a child. My magic helped me get out when they took me. I started learning the second I could and never stopped. I’m probably one of the best magic users the clan has. I try not to use it to hurt people…”
Speaking of hurting people… “He’s going to kill Gwen’s family. He’ll know she helped me get the drugs out of my system… we need to find them.”
The absence of her hand was staggering. Clearly he was more tired and drained than he had thought possible, even after tasting her blood. No...who was he kidding? Brodie felt fucking great. With the Goddess’s healing and feeding from Scarlett? He felt like a brick house.
“Well, guess I’m helpin’ ye. I promised someone I’d get ye to yer family. If that means after ye kill Ronan? Guess that’s tha plan.” He hadn’t had a chance to really slow down, to think about what had happened to him. The death, experiencing the power of a Goddess...her words to him. All to get Scarlett free. Now she was sitting in front of him...after he had fed from her, taken her body.
Something told him that twisted Goddess knew something like this was going to happen.
“Do you have any idea what you’re saying? Ronan will kill you…” She stopped talking for a moment then met him head on. “Tell me the honest truth, why did you come back for me? What really happened to make you risk it all for me?” Her hand moved to reach for his thigh but she quickly took it back, afraid to touch him.
“I died, lass. Took ma ass right to a Goddess. I’m no’ lying to ye. She told me...I had one chance ta make the right choice. Ta use ma life and get ye home. That yer family had suffered enough. I’m glad it happened.”
Her eyes pinned on him, soaking in those words. “Do you regret it? Saving me…” She wanted to crawl up in his lap...get her lips back on his throat…
Scarlett swallowed. “Can I...nevermind.”
“No’ the demanding highness ye were back in tha shower now, are ye?” Brodie teased, that smirk crossing his face. “I don’t regret it. But listen. That power ye used back there? It’s time ta channel that. Any weakness...and they will be the ones killin’ ye. Not tha other way around. Tell me what ye want, Scarlett. What’s at the tip of yer tongue?”
“They took a piece of me. A literal piece of me. That witch… It’s hard to explain. I’m so tired, Brodie. Bone-tired. But that feeding? It helped. I’ll need more of that before I go head-first into this battle. And I need to sleep...I’ll eat something after…” A smile took over, a soft laugh. “I want to kiss you again…”
“Come here then, Lass.” The words left Brodie’s lips before he had a chance to stop them, one hand reaching forward and capturing her chin. “But no sadness, no weakness. We are keeping ye strong and ready. Got me? Feed, sleep, blood. Hell, I’ll offer up another round of tha sex...ye know, because I’m at the mercy of the Gods. Nothing more.”
Scar growled, closing the distance between them as she leaned in for a kiss. “No weakness. But don’t bullshit me. Don’t lie and tell me it’s for the Gods.” She kissed him again, hand grabbing the front of his shirt to yank him closer. “This is so...wrong… but I can’t keep my hands off you.”
“Fine. It’s fer me.” He growled, hands grabbing her hips as he moved her around quickly, her back against the soft bed as he moved atop her. He dipped down, voice soft at her ear, “I believe ye were gonnae bite, yer highness.”
Scarlett let out a gasp, breath catching as he pinned her to the mattress. At his invitation, her fangs elongated, and she let out a feral growl. Leaning up, her fangs scraping along his neck. The tips poked into him but she didn’t bite. “Are you sure?” She mumbled against his throat. 
“Yer the Queen, lass. Take what I offer.” His voice was a growl, eyes bleeding black as his own fangs elongated. But there would be no more taking from her, not after earlier. She needed to keep the strength, keep her blood. Her fucking thumb, he was under it. Damn it all.
Her fangs sank into his neck, her moan muffled as she pulled from him. Scar’s hand moved to his chest, fingers clutching his t-shirt as she held him close. That blood, his blood...it was so rich. She growled out against him, biting harder as she fed.
Brodie groaned, eyes closing as he leaned over her, one hand stabilizing himself on the bed. He allowed her to continue to pull from him, take what she wanted. Trying to ignore her power pulsing through him, the jolt of energy and strength it seemed to give him despite what she was taking. It was...luxurious. She was luxurious.
His groan had her nails digging into his chest. All too soon she forced herself to pull away from his neck but she didn’t go too far. The tip of her tongue swirled against those wounds, sealing them as she licked the droplets of blood from his skin. “Fucking hell…” This was not what she intended…but her hand was still clutching his shirt and she wasn’t pushing him away.
“Take off yer clothing.” Brodie rumbled.

Chapter Twelve



Gwen was laying in her bed, eyes fixed on the ceiling as she remained alone with her thoughts. Outside, guards sent by Ronan stood, watching her home and ensuring she did nothing to escape. Not that she would even try. The King of those dirty bloodsuckers had her trapped. She had no idea where her family was, praying that her little move today wouldn’t end in their death.
Ronan had yet to come to her but with the increased security? She knew he would come soon. Until then, she remained holed up in the makeshift home offsite, waiting for him to decide what was to be done with her and her family.
The isolation wasn’t enough to silence the gossip, especially among the guards there. Guards that had been trusted with information, their silence well-paid and disobedience punishable by death. It looked like the King’s top bounty hunter had come and freed her. Perhaps it would not all be blamed on Gwendoline after all.
It was absolutely silent outside, void of the chatter of the vampire guards. Gwen slipped from her bed, nightgown falling to her ankles. Tucking a strand of her dark, short hair behind one ear, she trudged her way downstairs to the kitchen. The silence of her home eerie. No...this wasn’t her home. Her temporary cage.
Gwen opened her fridge, slate grey eyes scanning the contents. Nothing sounded good to her, nothing would calm her topsy-turvy stomach.
That was when she heard a creak from down the hallway. None of the guards ever entered the home, not unless they were bringing her to Ronan. Staggering backwards, Gwen’s hands started harnessing the grey smoke of her power, eyes scanning for anything else she could use as a weapon.
For several moments she remained there, listening to the home. A gust of wind hit against the side of the house and she sighed, hands lowering to her side. Just the weather.
Nothing to worry about.

~

Matt and his partner Liam snuck through the wood line. It wasn’t often the clan sent their fighters overseas to fight battles they weren’t involved with, but this was the King’s niece. From what he heard? The crazy mixed blood was looking to take down a King. Her uncle. However, by law he wasn’t really the King, she was their Queen.
Whatever. Not his mission. Their job was to find the witch that helped her escape and keep her protected until her family was found and the King was killed. Easy peasy.
Matt glanced around the wooded area, looking for the secondary team. Once they got the witch, the other two would head off to Scarlett’s location and stay with her. Sneaking up along the back side of the house, Matt and Liam scanned the area. Two guards. They only put two guards on the house.
Swinging around the corner, Matt shot one of them, then the second before he had a chance to get to his weapon. “Was it that easy?” He rumbled quietly.
Liam shrugged. “Go through the back, just in case.”
Matt nodded and headed for the back door, gun still drawn in case there were any more guards inside the home. Slowly, he opened the door, and stepped into the house. He moved down the hallway silently, on high alert.
The moment he hit the kitchen, Gwen was ready. She had seen his shadow dance along the floor near the fridge light, had been prepared despite not wanting to believe she was in further danger. Her magic launched across the kitchen, aimed for the stranger. Without looking to see if she hit him, Gwen sped through the kitchen, bare feet squeaking against the linoleum as she headed for the stairs as fast as she could.
Matt slammed into the wall, gun tumbling to the floor as he growled. “What the fuck. Liam stay down here.” he snapped, immediately taking off after her despite his head spinning.
It felt like he took a brick to the face. “Gwen STOP.” He took the stairs two at a time, trying to catch up to her.
“Scarlett sent us to help you. Stop fucking running.” Gods he hated a chase.
She heard the words but was having a hard time registering them, hitting the top stair faster than she had wanted to. Her foot snagged on her nightgown, sending her tumbling forward onto the ground. Hearing him close behind, Gwen whipped around onto her back, hands glowing as she aimed them at him. “I’m gonnae blow yer head off! I swear it!” But her hands were shaking.
She may have been a powerful witch, but only when she was able to concentrate and focus on the task and incantations at hand. During that moment? Her power was a mere flicker at her fingertips. His words suddenly made sense to her and one hand lowered, but the other pointed straight at him. “Yer no’ taking me from this house. They will kill ma family.”
Matt kept climbing those stairs, ignoring her threat. “I’m calling bullshit. Put your damn hands down.” He had no tolerance for it.
“We’re sending teams to find your family. Scarlett has a plan and that plan starts with getting you somewhere safe. They know you were part of the escape or will soon. They’ll kill you. Once you’re dead, it doesn’t matter, does it?” Matt’s hand reached for hers. “Let me help you up.”
She looked at his hand, then back at him. Her eyes wide and afraid as she reached forward towards him. But the moment her hand landed on his she gripped it tightly, eyes narrowing as she growled. “No’ a chance, Numpty.” Her power blasted out towards him, her hand latched on as she used that connection to focus it.
Before he knew it, Matt’s body flew backward. Those stairs he had just ran up, he was now tumbling down like a bowling ball. He hit the bottom with a thud, slamming into the wall. “Sonofafuckingbitch.” Matt got to his feet, holstering his gun.
“You know, I’m getting real tired of this magical bullshit.” He spat as he headed for the stairs again.
This time, he got to them faster, running up them and stopping two from the top. “Enough of that. You either come willingly or I knock you out and take you. Your choice.”
“Donnae look like yer able ta knock me out if ye wanted to!” Gwen yelled, finally on her feet, crouched low as her hands extended to her sides, the grey smoking power still flickering.
Matt sighed, hand going to the other gun on his left side. He slipped it from his holster and aimed it directly at her. “Last warning…” It wasn’t bullets in the gun, just tranq darts.
Darts that would put her on her ass for hours. “Don’t make me do this…”
“Bite ma arse, pretty boy.” She spat, shooting out at him.
But that’s when she froze, one hand lifting to her neck and the small dart buried in her skin. “You...bloody…” But she fell to her knees the next second, gaze unfocused as she tried to keep her eyes on him. “Piece o’ shyte…”
The second she had moved, Matt fired two shots, striking her with both darts. “Yeah, yeah, I’ve been called worse.” He waited until she was out before he approached the unconscious female.
He leaned down and scooped her up into his arms, flinging her over his shoulder with a grunt. “Liam, I need you to grab a bag of her stuff. Want to get her back to the hotel before she wakes up. She’s going to be a huge pain in the ass.”

Chapter Thirteen



Ronan sat behind his desk, leaning back in the black leather chair as his hand came up and rested on his chin. His fingers dug into his jaw, teeth grinding as he stared out the window to his right. That little bitch he called a niece bested him yet again.
Glancing down at his other hand, he observed the soft golden glow. Just the tiny bit of power he had been able to take from Scarlett was more than he expected but it was fading...fading fast. Was it because it was hers and hers alone? Was it because he needed all of it to work? He had no idea. At least this time it wasn’t turning his skin black.
With a growl, his hand shot out and backhanded the cup full of pens on his desk, sending it flying toward the bookshelf. He watched it shatter, eyes bleeding black as he panted out a ragged breath. Scarlett was constantly ruining everything. His true right to rule, his desire to get a hold of her unbelievably strong powers...and Brodie?
That prick. Not that Ronan truly trusted anyone, but Brodie was one of the few he… liked to have close. He was one of their best hunters, one of the most ruthless. He was almost saddened by his death but seeing him come back and aid that niece of his? Brodie was as dead as Scarlett was. It would be long and torturous. Oh yes, so very torturous.
Taking a deep breath, Ronan reached for his phone and texted Victoria to come to his office with Leon. They needed to have a conversation, needed to make a plan.
It was only a few minutes later when the two were allowed in, Victoria’s emerald eyes fixing on Ronan. There was no smile on her face, just a permanent grimace that had taken up shop the moment she saw Brodie, the moment that bitch Scarlett had used her to buy some time and get free. Brodie...there had been the smallest bit of her that was happy he was alive.
Any relief she found in his reappearance had been smothered out at this point. That idiot was going to get her killed by association with whatever game he was playing. Victoria was still unable to wrap her head around how he had survived in the first place. How Scarlett had gone free.
Her arms were crossed tightly at her chest, pushing her breasts up high, Leon lumbering in after her. “I dinnae have anything ta do with it.” She murmured, eyes calculating as she bowed deep. Not forgetting her respect despite trying to ensure she wasn’t there to be punished.
Ronan turned that cold stare on her as soon as she spoke. A low growl escaped as he pointed at the two chairs on the opposite side of his desk. “Just shut up and take a seat, lass.”
He didn’t think she was responsible. He had the pleasure of watching the two of them go for each other’s throats over the last few years and if there was anyone he doubted working together, it was the two of them. If anything, he had his money on her climbing into bed with Leon.
“We need ta make a plan. You know Brodie better than anyone else. Where would he go? What would he be plannin’?” He turned to Leon.
“Don’ need you for strategy. Just need to know I have you for weapons. For the battle, because you know as well as I do there will be a battle when the clan shows.”
Leon nodded. “Aye. You’ve got me for anything you need, my King.” His head bowed ever so slightly, a sign of respect for the one he saw as the true ruler of Scotland.
Victoria let out a breath of air as she lowered herself into the chair, hands falling to her lap as she watched Ronan, trying to read his energy and the thoughts behind his words. Always one to tread carefully despite her knee jerk past. “He’s got a lot of aliases. Though I’m sure he’s no’ using them knowing I’m here. Still...that should give ya a direction.” She sighed, one hand rising to her curly red hair as she glanced over to Leon. “I’d be more worried about the bitch... I…” She didn’t know if she wanted to bring it up but the words spilled from her lips before she had a chance to stop them.
“I heard Gwen is missin’. Do ye still have her family?”
“Don’ you worry ya pretty little head about the witch or her family. That’s nah what were talkin’ ‘bout. I’m gonna need ya help with Brodie and mah niece. We need to find her before her family comes. Or be ready for an attack.” He shifted slightly, glancing at Leon. “Go on outta here and get your best teams together. Start makin’ plans, do a weapons check, get as many of the locals on our side as we can. I’ll send Vic ta ya later.”
Leon paused, frowning. “That’s it? That’s all I’m here fer?”
Ronan’s eyes narrowed as his flashed his fangs. “Don’ question me. Go. Get ya second hand and go do what I’ve asked ya ta do.”
“As ya wish, my King.” Leon stood, glaring at Victoria before he turned on a heel and headed out. He was far more experienced with war, she was a damned bounty hunter.
He let the door close with a slam.
“Christ.” Ronan sighed.
Victoria had heard enough from his trusted guards, had done her research. She wondered if everything she had investigated was true. If the King had truly gone through multiple magic users, attempting to take their magic to keep his influence over the clan. Did he have any of that magic, now? What did she have to do to learn more? To gain favor with him?
When she smiled, it was sickly sweet and concerned. Nothing like the normal flame she possessed, even with him pushing her out of the information about Gwen. She was surprised the King wasn’t throwing things or in a murderous rage. He seemed...almost calm. Irritated...but calm.
“I know his normal spots, I can always check there...Cannae gone far. We’ll find his car.” She leaned forward in her chair, taking a deep breath before she spoke more. “I’ll do anything fer ya, my King. You know my loyalty is here. I’ll take down Brodie, just as I had thought I did ‘afore.” He had been shot...he had gone down in the plane. How he wasn’t at least limping? She had no fucking clue.
Ronan let out a deep chuckle as he fought to control the rage bubbling below the surface. “Ya couldn’t even kill ‘em right ta first time. No lass, I’m not sendin’ ya ta tha field. Make me a list and I’ll send Leon and his men. You? Ya gonna stay right here with me.” He stood, coming around his desk.
He stopped in front of her, leaning forward. “I want ya right where I can see ya, Vic.” There was a hint of distrust there.
Her eyes watched him like a predator, taking in his words and trying to control her own. She wanted to be in the action, wanted to get her revenge on Brodie and that stupid, magical bitch he was towing around like a lovesick puppy. But there was no way the King would allow such things if he knew how unfocused that rage made her. Perhaps the very reason he was putting her there in eyesight.
But wasn’t that exactly what she wanted? To slide her way into his good favor and get a chance at sharing the throne? She would be an excellent Queen. Bloodthirsty, controlling, able to play the part of a dutiful wife while she enjoyed the riches and glory she could only have dreamed of. She would finally have all of the riches that poor, stupid Brodie could never give her.
“Where ye can see me?” She crossed her legs, her heels dipped towards the ground as she let her foot sway back and forth. “Ye seem so stressed, my King. I can get information to the right place...are ye sure there’s no’ anything else I can do ta help yer stress?” She uncrossed her legs, leaning forward slightly as she allowed her breasts to press against the fabric of her black tank top. It was casual wear but she was happy for the freedom. Especially at that moment.
Take. The. Bait.
Ronan listened, one eyebrow cocking up slightly. “By ma side fer tha moment. Then we’ll see. Don’ know if ya workin’ with Brodie and if ya not, I don’ think I can trust ya to keep a clear head.” His hand lifted, finger tapping the underside of her chin and tipping her head back slightly.
“I know tha rage you hold, girlie. Ya get yerself killed… or worse, me. So no. Ya stay put where I can see ya.” His eyes traveled lower, glancing down at the breasts she put on full display.
A smirk replaced the serious look he typically wore. “What are ya offerin’, lass?”
He was correct in assuming her head would not be in the game. But it was a different game she was playing now and the stakes were much higher. Victoria had been a scavenger since she was a young girl, and in that moment she knew what the end game was. Getting this man to trust her, to want her.
With what she knew, Victoria was certain no other women were around. Knew they weren’t aware of his plan. She could use that to make him feel safe, to be there for him. Manipulation had always been her calling.
“I lust fer ya. Just...an offer.” Her legs parted slightly in that chair, eyes on him intently.
Ronan leaned a little closer. He may have been a lot of things, but a fool wasn’t one of them. He knew Victoria, knew females like her. They sought out power, thrived off it. She was just lucky he found her mission for power entertaining.
Removing his finger from her chin, he dropped his hand to her thigh, fingertips gliding up before stopping short. “I think it’s a bunch of bullshite. I think ya lust for power. Money. Material things but no man.” Without giving her a chance to speak, he leaned in and kissed her.
Her mouth was partially open, ready to snap back with a response but he quickly covered it. She moaned, agreeing with his words and accepting his kiss easily. But Victoria was not a soft woman, didn’t need romance and never wanted it. Something told her he was the very same.
In the end, the two vipers were actually quite similar.
She growled against his lips, nipping at his bottom one as her eyes bled black and closed, giving into the sensation, needing more. Wanting his hands at her throat. “Take it, my King.” She murmured against him. “Maybe yer right. Maybe that is what I want.”
Ronan growled against the kiss, hands moving to the hem of her tank top. He started to work it up her torso, breaking the kiss only to pull it from her body and toss it to the floor. In a flash, his hands were back on her hips, lifting her and turning to place her on the edge of his desk. “That is what ya are. Ya just lucky I find it attractive.” That and there was a small bit of pleasure knowing he was about to claim Brodie’s ex-wife.
Dipping down, Ronan’s fangs found her neck, teasingly scraping along her delicate skin before he kissed it. “Vic…” Her name was a growl on his lips.
She knew it was just a tease. There was no possible way the King would ever bite someone who wasn’t pure, sent to him to fuel the clan. Someone who was not his woman. But that didn’t matter, it was erotic anyway, her fangs elongating against her lip as she sat at the edge of his desk, legs parting to welcome him closer, other hand lowering to the zipper on her pants. But the damn thing was too tight, not pulling down.
With a growl she tore the front of her pants open so she could lift her hips and drag them downward. Not caring that the fabric was ripped. Caring only about giving herself up for the smallest taste of power.
There was something in his kiss and touch, something that she couldn’t put her finger on. Was it that magic she had heard of? Did he really have it? She wanted to feel it, needed to get herself closer. “Whatever ye wish, take it.” Hopping off the desk she growled, allowing the jeans to fall to the ground as she hooked her fingers on her panties and lowered them.
Ronan pulled back to watch her strip, breath hitching as she lowered her panties. Snapping out of it, his hands moved to his own pants. As fast she removed hers, he worked even quicker to spring his hard-on free. “I want ye to stop talkin’” He rumbled.
Stepping forward, he yanked her from the desk and flipped her around before bending her over the heavy oak. Taking his length in his hand, he lined up with her entrance, a teasing nudge against her. Ronan leaned down, lips finding the back of her shoulder before he placed a rough nip. “Beg, Vic.”
She hated begging, hated needing to have something. But it was the only way he was going to allow it and with the wood pressing against her breasts and body open to him, she begged.
“Please...please ma Lord. Take me. I need it.” She did, body begging for him as she wiggled against him, pressing his hard length against her.
Ronan pushed into her with a single thrust, filling and stretching her as he buried deep. A growl of approval rumbled from his lips as his hands landed on her hips. Standing upright, he held his grip tight, his thrusts picking up speed and depth quickly, those thrusts relentless.
She growled, moaning out as his body hit hers, feeling him so deep within her. Each thrust rocking her body against his desk, making the pens and paperwork fall to the floor. She didn’t care if Leon was just outside, listening. Didn’t care who was around. She was being claimed, in some twisted way, by the body of their leader. Sinking her fangs and nails into him without even turning around to touch him.
“Yes...oh yes!” Her cries grew ever louder each time he buried himself inside her.
One hand left her hip and traveled up her back, stopping when he got to her long red hair. His fingers twisted up in it, yanking her head back slightly as he plunged deep once more. Her cries were bringing him close to an orgasm, that feisty redhead, something he had wanted to sample for so long.
Ronan tugged at her hair. “Cum.” He snarled, barely holding his back himself but enough of a gentleman to make sure she got hers first.
Victoria almost laughed, as if he could command such things from her, as if he truly cared. She never had an orgasm, no matter how good the sex was, and the King was only someone she wanted to use. The only time she truly came? When it was by her own hand, thinking of those she had used and the power she held.
But it was nice, really.
She arched her back towards him, meeting his thrusts with her own, pushing back against his body. Her head yanked back by his firm grasp. Grinding her body against him to urge that orgasm.
Ronan’s eyes closed, losing it when she ground back against him. “Ahh, fuck.” He didn’t care if she finished at that point, needing to finish himself.
With a final tug, he let go of her hair. “Where?” He ground out.
But he wanted nothing more than to fill her, mark her with his scent.
She turned around, quick as lightning as her body moved down his and took the length of him in her mouth. She worked Ronan until he came hard into her mouth. Her emerald eyes were on him, positively wicked as she swallowed every last drop.
A strangled grunt escaped him as he watched her mouth work, his hand resting easily on the top of her head, once again tangling up in her hair. The move shocked him but pleased him far more than she could have imagined. When he was finished, he pulled away from her and yanked his pants back up. “Impressive, lass.”
Leaving her where she was, he moved back to his chair and dropped into it. Those dark eyes were still on her, watching her as she dressed. “Anxious ta see what else ya can do fer me.” His grin was absolutely wicked.
“Oh ye have no’ idea.” Victoria murmured.

Chapter Fourteen



Brodie’s dark eyes scanned over the group in front of him. It was hard to keep the disgust from crossing his thin, tight lips. His left hand was spinning the rings on his right, one eyebrow quirked as he pointed down at the map in front of him.
Well, it was as good of a map as he could have made considering the circumstances they found themselves in. Hell, it was already risky enough after getting Gwen. Not that she was pleased at all with that turn of events. The magic on Gwen was foul, not something Brodie wanted to be around in the slightest. Sure, he was eating crow after enjoying each magical pulse of Scarlett...but that didn’t mean he was fine with all magic.
Not by a long shot.
The worst part? He had decades on each of the fighters before him. Scarlett was powerful but she wasn’t going to be able to do this on her own. The team that had been sent over by the city was composed of seven different supernaturals. The fact that they all fought together...raised children of mixed bloodlines. Call him racist but it was completely and utterly foreign to him. Little by little he was realizing how stupid that was. Learning about the different shifters and vampire mixes in their midst? Whatever.
Brodie’s nimble hands reached forward and grabbed onto his drawn map, pointing at it. Eyes on Gwen. She had been less than cooperative since being brought in and although she didn’t use her power against them, it pressed against the walls and his skin. A presence that was far from pleased.
“I know this place like tha back of ma hand. But no’ his office. You’ve been there, Gwendoline. Throw us a bone, aye? Killing him gives up yer family.”
“If he hasn’t killed them, already! Git!”
Scarlett paced along the far side of the room. Even with it only being the four of them there, she felt suffocated. She knew Matthew but not well enough to invite him into some big war she was planning...apparently her parents trusted him enough.
Dark eyes cut across the room, landing on the other American. She studied the tight line of his lips, the serious wrinkle lines around his eyes, the no bullshit demeanor that poured off him. She liked him.
Matt’s gaze lifted, shifting to look at Scarlett. His eyes seemed to be just as calculating as hers. Only he wasn’t as supportive as she was. He doubted she would be able to pull this off, even with the help she had. An annoyed sigh escaped him as his fingers dug into Gwen’s upper arm. “Just answer the fucking question.” He had long ago lost his patience for the witch.
Scarlett crossed the room, stopping a few inches from Gwen. “You gave me my power back for a reason. You knew the moment you did that, your family was dead. So why stop there? He still has them and you can bet your ass they’re dead if you don’t help us. They might still be alive for all you know but let’s be real, you really think my uncle doesn’t know you were involved in my escape?” She scoffed and stepped back.
“Better be nice ta me, lass.” Gwen growled, glancing at the man holding her.
Now that she wasn’t blinded by fear, it was clear these idiots weren’t taking her seriously. She had taken away Scarlett’s power, a bit of herself. One she had to miss...had to want back. There she was, scoffing in the face of the one person who could give it to her.
“Let me go, ya oaf. Then I’ll tell ye. But I’m gonnae go fer ma family the moment ye strike. I’ll no’ have them getting killed during this if...if they aren’t already.” There was a sorrow there, one that was hard to mask.
“Let her go.” Brodie murmured, hand rising to run through his dark hair. “Afore she blows us all up or something.”
Scarlett’s hands lit up as she cast another glare in Gwen’s direction. “Not the only witch in the room. But I’m certainly the only one from royal blood.”
Scar bit back a hiss, gaze flicking to Matt. “Do as he says. But she goes nowhere, the two of you share a room. You don’t let her out of your sight until we go back to the castle. Then she can go on whatever suicide mission she wants so long as she’s out of my way.”
She was out for blood. She wanted to see her uncle’s head on a pike. It wasn’t because of the throne, no, she didn’t want that, never had. It was because the damage he had done to her, her family. As far as she was concerned? He was was part of the reason Mason had been killed and his death had done something to her mother. Her fathers too.
Matt said nothing but released his hold on her. Crossing his arms, he fell back a few steps and leaned into the wall. He had no input, waiting for the girl to call the shots. His team would be ready to help as soon as she was ready to go. He had a feeling she wouldn’t take his advice anyhow. “Any ideas on when we’re going to raid them?” He asked and was met by Scarlett’s shrug.
“I need a day to think.”
“We may only have a day.” Brodie said then, glancing out the window of the hotel and down at the parking lot.
It really was only a matter of time before they were scented out. Especially with the eyes on the airport. Who knew if these men had properly covered their tracks, or if Gwen was somehow sending some magical alerts to her former captor. There were so many things that could go awry.
Gwen took a step forward the moment she was released, turning on her heel to glare up at Matt with her grey eyes. Her freckles were shining in the dim light of the room, seeming almost like wrinkles as she frowned, scrunching up her face. “Yer lucky ye scared the shyte outta me, vamper. Or I would have knocked ye down those stairs once more.” She turned back around again, stomping over to the table before she grabbed for the pen.
Brodie said nothing as she filled in that blank spot to the left. The spot where they knew the King would hide.
“That’s the layout.” She murmured.
Matt rolled his eyes but managed to keep his mouth shut. He wasn’t worried about the tiny woman. Even with her magic, he managed to best her. “Scarlett?” As far as he was concerned, she was his boss.
Scarlett held up a hand and shook her head. A silent ‘leave it be.’
“I was in the office for such a short time and I wasn’t paying attention to anything but my uncle and your bitch of an ex, Brodie. You know the place the best. Best way in? The way out won’t matter when Ronan is dead.” But then what?
What was she going to do then? Pick someone else to rule the country? She didn’t know who she could trust, who she couldn’t. A frustrated growl rumbled out of her as she brought her hands up to rub her face. “Matt, how many men did you bring?”
“There’s six of us without the three of you.” He shrugged.
“Six. A whole clan and they only sent six of you.” She sighed, turning to Brodie. “I don’t suppose you have any friends?”
“I have a few.” He said then, pausing when Gwen took the pen once more.
“There’s a separate entrance ta the office back here...tucked away. It also leads ta the cells. It may be where they move him if ye get far.”
“Perfect.” Brodie was grinning, the look similar to a cheshire cat as he leaned down over the map. “I have a few mates I can call. But we are fucked if we just run in. How long cannae run that ward, Scarlett? If we can get ta the front and get in while others run a distraction, we will get ta him ‘afore they know we’re there.” He glanced over to Scarlett. “Kill him fast, yer highness. Some long ritual sacrifice will give them too much time. Just...do it.” He teased, that sarcastic nickname flying off his lips.
Scarlett’s head snapped to Brodie when he called her by that official title. For a split second her body was frozen in place. This was real. Too real for her. She had to clear her throat before she could respond. “Aww, but Brodie, you know how much I enjoy letting things suffer.” Her hands buzzed at her sides, glowing that soft golden hue.
“I don’t know how long I can hold it. It will depend on how many people will be under it. If Gwen steps up to the plate and helps us, she can take half and go in through the back. I can take half and hit the front. Trap him. Kill anyone who gets in the way, anyone who helps or backs down survives until I decide what to do with them after.” Her hand came up, running through her hair.
“Gwen will you help us?” She pinned the other witch with a hard stare.
Gwen was silent for several moments, grey eyes scanning each and every one of them. She knew she was risking everything by helping her, by hoping this very situation would happen. Her family had to still be alive, she could...feel them.
“Aye. I’ll help.” She said, feeling defeated, exhausted, and hungry. Turning to Matt, she growled unnecessarily. “But ye have ta feed me.”
Brodie nodded, the smallest shadow of a smile on his face. He knew despite the deal he had made with the Goddess, his task was over. She was safe, she would be returned home. Her deciding to stay was not a part of the deal. He could already feel the grasp of the Goddess drifting away from him. At first it had been a constant reminder of his task, one that drove him towards Scarlett.
Now, it was barely there. He was simply...in the room on his own accord. Was he really going to do this? Roam along and help get them all killed? For what? To just throw the entire land into a world without a ruler. There was no way Scarlett would stay, that her family would allow such things. Ruin. Their world would be in ruin. Or someone else would rise and take the throne, someone worse off than Ronan.
Scarlett turned to Matt and Gwen once more. “Leave us. Go to your room, Matt buy her whatever she wants, my parents will handle it.” Her mouth closed, jaw clenched tightly.
She wouldn’t say another word until they were gone.
Matt’s mouth opened, then closed, a glare of frustration crossing his features. “Yes Ma’am. Let me know when you have a plan set in stone.” He wouldn’t be sleeping until then, not trusting Gwen not to bolt in the middle of the night.
The moment Gwen and Matt were out of the room, Brodie glanced over at her, studying Scarlett. Really wondering why he was concrete in his decision to remain there and help, even after knowing he wouldn’t get struck down the moment he left.
Yes, the sex was fantastic. Even in the midst of this chaos Brodie felt his mouth water for her, wanting nothing more than to break in the hotel room and lay her down on the sheets...have her squirm for him.
Clearing his throat, Brodie made his way over to the mini-fridge, grabbing a water bottle and chugging down half. All he wanted was whiskey, but they had to keep their time outside to a minimum. You never knew who was watching.
“Guess we’re killin’ tha King.”
Scarlett watched him move around the room, her eyes darkening, almost bleeding black. She could feel the tension rolling off him and it had her on the tip of her toes. “Stop. Whatever you’re thinking about, stop it.” The sex was a mistake, she should have kept her distance.
When would she ever learn?
“We are going to kill him. After that? I don’t know. I…” She paused. “I think I want to stay here. For a little while. My family has been fine without me the last couple of months. What’s another few?” She nipped her bottom lip and moved to take a seat on the edge of the bed.
When she looked up at him again, she sighed. “You don’t think I can do this, do you?”
The vampire was across the room in a matter of a blink, leaning down in front of her body. His eyes had bled black, fangs elongating as one hand jumped out to hold her chin, focusing her eyes on him.
“First of all, there’s a great many things ye can demand of me. To tell me no’ to think something? Not one of ‘em. I can think of…” His eyes scanned her body, lingering and long, “Anything I want, lass. Second of all. What did I say about bein’ strong, aye?” His hand lightened, almost a caress against her skin. “It donnae matter what I think because yer the real Queen and yer killing him.”
The second his hand made contact with her skin, she growled. Her reactions mirrored his, fangs elongating as her eyes bled black. Her hand shot out, grabbing his wrist but not pulling it away from her, not striking out with any kind of magic. “You know as well as I do we shouldn’t have done that.” But her hand was moving, sliding down his forearm before she let go and moved it back to her lap.
“It does matter. It matters because you’re...you…” She pushed away from him, squirming back to give herself some breathing space. “You’re all I have here. You’re supposed to have my back when we go in there. So yeah, your opinion matters.”
Brodie was watching her, an amused look on his face. But it was blank, a cover for what was swirling around beneath the surface. Waves of different emotions crossing behind the facade like a race. A race to see which one would finally win over.
“I know yer gonnae kill him, Scarlett.” He said then. “I’ve watched ye for some time and if there’s a few things I’ve learned it’s that ye have an army at yer back, no one can seem ta kill ye, and that revenge plays a big role in yer family. When ye kill him, try not ta behead me. I’d love a nice severance package.”
Her eyes were on him, studying him. “What if I stay to rule? Would you sit beside me then? What do they call it… a...what’s the word...confidente? No, no, something else with a c…”
“Village idiot?”
Scarlett growled, scowling at him as she snatched a pillow from the bed and threw it at him. “No, smart ass. I’m being serious...I know that castle is full of old money...old money that goes so deep I couldn’t spend it all if I tried. I could pay you more than you make...kidnapping and killing people.”
He knew she was being serious, knew she needed an answer from him. Brodie moved over to the second bed in the room, throwing down the covers before jumping in. The lights were on and she was on the opposite bed but that was the only way he was going to keep from thinking of her. Unless he could get her to think of him in return…
He’d see how much of a mistake the other night was. Because it sure as hell didn’t feel like one to him. No matter her status.
“I’ll stay ta make sure ye don’t burn it down. Yes, lass.” He said, eyes holding hers as he trailed one ringed hand over the white sheets next to him. “Ye know...if yer gonnae be a Queen soon...it would be bad of me ta make moves on ye. But now…” His hand lowered to his shirt, moving it up his muscled torso and allowing it to fall to the ground.
Scarlett was off her bed, closing the distance between them faster than he could blink. Her moves were quick, sleek as she crawled up onto the bed and over him, straddling him as she leaned down. She was in his face when his shirt hit the ground. “Promise me.” Her lips were dangerously close to his.
“Promise you’ll have my back, that you won’t go anywhere. That you won’t burn me down like you do everyone else.” Her hand came out, grabbing him by the chin this time. “Promise.”
This was clearly a theme in his life. Giving his word in exchange for the loyalty of powerful women.
“Aye, I promise.”

~

Brodie had found pleasure in Scarlett’s body again that night. His hands had explored her, brought her pleasure, needed more. Even when they were exhausted and collapsed against the sheets, he still wanted more.
Had it not been for the time, they would have.
It was the deep of night, with Scarlett laying on one of his outstretched arms, that Brodie’s eyes snapped open. Something was wrong, he could feel it.
Across the room, there was a small, blinking light coming from his pants. Without a word, he slowly moved out from under the blanket and towards his pants, palming the burner phone he had set up the day before.
Messages. He was receiving messages from an unknown number. They were coming at an alarming speed, his dark eyes scanning the words in front of him.

We all know what you want.
Your King demands that you bring me her head in exchange for the money you are owed, tenfold.
Do so and your life will be spared, the witch’s family will be spared, and you will be given land and power.
We await your decision.

He should have given the phone immediately to Scarlett, should have sent it off to figure out where they were, how they had gotten his information. But instead, Brodie placed the phone down with a slow, steady hand. But not before sending a response. One word. Praying it would buy them the time they needed to best him, to get to the castle.

Yes

Brodie turned, dark eyes focusing on the sleeping form of Scarlett.

Chapter Fifteen



Matt sat at the small table in the hotel room staring at the food on the plate. Picking up his fork, he poked it twice before his face twisted slightly. He didn’t know what the fuck it was but Gwen wanted it, ordered it, and it was eat it or starve.
Such was the life of a military man.
Matt dug in, shoveling the food into his mouth, chewing and swallowing without thinking. Occasionally, his gaze would flicker over to Gwen, ensuring she was still there. She was. She hadn’t said much since they left Scarlett and Brodie’s room.
Finishing what was left on his plate, he put the fork down and shifted to look at her. “You really going to help Scarlett?” His tone was a hint softer than it usually was.
Just a hint.
She was staring down at the haggis in front of her. She went for the sticky toffee pudding first, taking a bite and leaning back in the bed. She didn’t answer him right away, stabbing at her food for a bit, instead.
Finally, Gwen spoke. “Yes. But whether ma family is alive or dead, I think I may still hate vampires ‘til the day I die. No’ exactly been a free woman in tha hands of ‘em. Her magic side helps with decision-making.” There was a shadow of a smile on her face, eyes feeling heavy as she glanced over to him.
“Scarlett will do whatever she can to get your family back. Do you know anything about her history? What happened to her as a child? She cares about your family, whether you believe that or not, she’ll get them out safe if they’re still alive. She won’t keep you as...some kind slave...or something like that.” He glanced at the witch.
“She knows what it’s like…”
“Perhaps so.” She responded softly.
Gwen stared ahead at him, trying to get a read on the man assigned to watch over her. Well...as far as her helping, he was kind of right. Despite him having to ensure she was in the room and didn’t leave, she was offering to help. There had been no force when Scarlett asked her.
“What’s yer story, tall dark an’ pissy?” She inquired then, crossing one leg over the other as she peered over at Matt with those grey eyes.
Matt turned slightly in the chair he was occupying. He was facing Gwen for the first time, really looking at her. Specifically, those slate grey eyes. They drew him in and held him there. “Tall, dark, and pissy? I’m not that bad. Just doing a job, a job you made harder. I don’t like it when people make my job harder.” He shrugged, it was difficult enough.
“Don’t have one. Been with the clan as a fighter for a few decades, working my way up as a team leader. No wife, no kids. Better that way. No one back home for our enemies to hold over my head if I’m captured. My duty is to the clan. To members like Scarlett and her family.” He paused. “How did you get caught up with Ronan?”
“I specialize in a certain type o’ magic tha leech needed.” She glanced down at her hands. “He took ma family and helping him was tha only way to get them free.” She seemed frustrated then, unable to assemble more words. There was anger there, anger that her family was in an unknown area, potentially dead.
She swallowed back tears, not allowing them to fall.
“I’m sorry...about your family. But Scarlett means what she says, I’ve never known her to not be truthful. If they’re still alive, she will make sure their safety is a priority. My team knows that too. You don’t...you don’t have any photos of them or anything do you? It would help us to keep them out of the cross fire.”
Gwen shook her head. “Ye drug me out in just ma nightie. Or donnae remember?” She gave him a small wink, crossing her legs again as she leaned back into her chair and took another bite of the food in front of her.
The flirting was borderline hysterical. She wasn’t actually looking to get laid, no matter how attractive the American was. In the end, he was still a bloodsucker. She just wanted her family back.
But for a moment, a brief moment, Gwen was able to pretend like nothing was wrong and tease a little bit, try to get her attention off what was happening outside of the hotel room.
Matt’s brow quirked up, his head tilting slightly. “Oh I remember just fine, I also remember getting blasted down the stairs.” He paused slightly.
“Are you...did you just… are you flirting with me, witch?” An amused smirk crossed his lips.
She liked the smile, it blacked out a good four seconds of stress. “Aye, so what if I was? I’m bored. Ye basically have me hostage and haven’t invoked any bad arse sexual prowess, yet. Yer borin’. At least tha food here a’ the hostage hotel is good.” She pointed down at her plate, the smallest of grins cracking across her face.
“You’re not a hostage...just...keeping an eye on you.” He grunted.
Nah, she was a fuckin’ hostage. But how could she not be? “Listen, we just want to keep you safe.” Matt stood, abandoning his food and coming closer to her. “I’m not boring. Far from, but I’m working. This is my job. I get distracted, you could be dead.”
She watched him approach carefully, eyes on every movement. What was he doing? Had she pushed things too far? Gwen’s experience with vampires had been less than desirable thus far and there was clearly a reason her family had warned her to stay far away from them. A lot of good that did them.
“Aye, well I guess we will see tomorrow. Might be all okay. Might work out. Then maybe I’ll get a chance to blow ye away again.” Her hands lit for a short moment, a small tease as she tried to get everything she could out of the escape.
No matter how temporary and stupid it was.
Matt snorted, lifting his gaze to look her dead in the eye. “I dare you to try it again, little witch. This time, I’m expecting it.” The corners of his mouth twitched into a smirk.
“But you should hold off on that until tomorrow. Don’t want to waste your energy fucking with me.” He shrugged.
“Aye. But I donnae think it would be a waste at all.” She said, eyes scanning down his body once more before shoving another bite in her mouth, placing her fork down near the remaining food. It was late, she was full enough. Gwen looked over at the beds and stood. Thankfully her abrupt vacancy had left her in a comfortable nightgown...but that was not going to do for the fight the next day.
She’d borrow something from the half breed.
“Guess ye better get some shut eye. Tomorrow is gonnae be a shyte fest.”

Chapter Sixteen



Scarlett woke early the next morning, her body far from well-rested. The anxiety of what was about to go down was keeping her from sleeping in. Matt and his team knew the plan, she was confident about having Gwen on their team, and with Brodie having her back, what could go wrong?
Hopefully nothing.
But that was never how that happened. Things never went smoothly, she knew that. Slowly, Scarlett pulled the blanket back and slipped out of bed. Tiptoeing over to the table, she looked at the phone Brodie left there. She eyed it for a moment, glancing back at the sleeping form in the bed. It was rude of her to use his things without asking, but then again, she was his Queen.
Picking it up, she turned it on. The first thing to pop up was an unread message from an unknown number. Scarlett frowned, turning back to look at Brodie. Against her better judgement, she opened the message.
Good.
Good? Good what? Scrolling further up, she read the rest of the conversation. Immediately, her blood started to boil. That backstabbing son of a bitch. Without thinking, Scarlett whirled around and threw the phone directly at Brodie. “Wake up.” She barked, hands glowing and shaking at her sides.
Brodie’s eyes snapped open in a panic, immediately reaching for his weapons next to the bed. But he paused when he realized they were alone, soon after wishing he had grabbed them anyway. The power in her hands? The look in Scarlett’s eyes? Something was wrong.
The phone that hit him secured his fears.
“It’s no’ what ya think, Lass. It was ta buy us time. I donnae know how they got the number.” Both his hands rose in defense.
Scarlett’s hand shot up, a glowing golden ball in the palm of her hand as she hissed out at him, fangs elongating. “Don’t you dare…” She eyed the weapons next to him.
If he went for one, she was going to blast him into next week. “I don’t believe you. You’re so...so...fucking fickle. Take me for money, break me out for your life, stay with me...for no reason really, I had nothing to offer you, did I? Not really. So it shouldn’t surprise me that you’d go right back to them.” She was seething but below that anger?
Hurt.
She trusted Brodie and he blew that all to bits. “Don’t bullshit me, Brodie. Do anything but lie to my face like I’m some kind of idiot!” Her power surged through the room, the ball dancing about in her hand, itching to be released.
“I trusted you. I truly trusted you.”
Brodie growled, his eyes darkening as his own fangs elongated, the points pressing against his bottom lip as his brow furrowed. “I told ye. You’ve got it wrong. He won’t see the attack comin’, now.” He didn’t lower his hands, lifting his body from the bed as he stood, taking one step closer to Scarlett.
“Ye can trust me! Shyte! Put those glowy things down!”
Scarlett growled back, lip curling as she stared at him. “Bullshit he won’t.”
Her hands dropped, still glowing as she started to pace. “How can I believe a word you say? You’re not really known for doing things for others, just yourself. He’ll kill you. You already betrayed him once, he’ll put a bullet in your head as soon as you walk in there.” She snapped at him.
“No, lass! See that’s why I dinnae let ye in on this. He won’t expect our attack today, thinkin’ I’ll be showin’ up with yer head. Just buyin’ a moment, if it works.” He took another step towards her, keeping his hands up, still wishing he had his weapons for some sort of defence with the way she was stalking around.
“Stop with tha magic.” He growled then, reaching out towards her arm.
The second Brodie reached out for her, Scarlett whirled. Magic shot from the tips of her fingers like licks of lightning, the glowing ball in her hand reabsorbed. It was a warning shot, telling Brodie to stay the fuck back if he knew what was good for him. “Don’t. Stay away from me.” She hissed, taking a step back as she dropped the magic.
“You can’t be stupid enough to believe that’s what he’ll be thinking.” She shook her head.
“Ye don’t know shyte about strategy, little highness, shyte about it.” Brodie snapped, knowing there was nothing he could say to get through to her but trying, anyway. “I’m tellin’ ye the truth.” How could he look at her and make her see what he was trying to explain?
She was hot-headed and trigger happy, clearly on edge with the attack later that day and the thought that he had betrayed her.
The hurt in Scarlett’s eyes was never what he wanted in invoke.
“That’s your strategy? Tell my uncle you’ll go back to him? You truly believe he is going to believe a word you say after betraying him? I don’t have to know strategy to know that’s a stupid plan. If that even is your plan.” She sent another flash of magic toward his feet, forcing him a step back.
“Stay the fuck away from me.” With that, she headed for the door.

Chapter Seventeen



She was out the door before Brodie had a chance to stop her. With her words lingering in the air, he had a moment to reflect alone. There was only the echo of her footsteps leaving earshot as she moved towards Matt’s room to collect the rest of their team. Either they were going to kill his King, or Scarlett and her band of misfits were going to die at his hand.
Violently, if Ronan had his way.
This was the chance that Brodie needed, he could get out of there and far away from Scotland. Far away from Victoria and Scarlett and all those mad ideas of temporarily taking rule. Away from watching her and planning. He had enough...enough to get by and get free.
The worst part about all those thoughts swarming through Brodie’s head as he collected his weapons and valuables...was that he knew there was no chance he wasn’t going to help.
Even without the grasp of the divine surging through him, even with the hot-headed temper of Scarlett, he was attached to her in ways he could not describe. He had gone through too much shit in the last few days, there was no way he was going to ditch out during the finale.
Not without ensuring Scarlett was okay...that she knew he hadn’t betrayed her.
It sickened him how much he needed to prove that to her.
Shaking those thoughts from his mind, Brodie walked over to the window, cracking the shades and glancing down at the parking lot. Several cars, including his own temporary ride. But Matt’s was gone.
He wouldn’t be far behind.

~

After leaving the shared hotel room, Scarlett headed down to Matt and Gwen’s room. She needed some space, had to get the hell away from Brodie. It took her mere minutes to fill Matt in on what happened, her distrust. But of course, he offered no advice on the subject, just a grunt in response.
She should have known with Matt. He never allowed himself to get sucked into the drama. Especially not when he needed a clear head. No, Matt was always battle-ready and today was no different. He just knew now they had one more person to watch out for.
After gathering the rest of the team, Scarlett followed Matt and Gwen down to the rented SUV. “So we’ll park a few miles down, head through the woods. I know the way from when we had our crash landing. Once we get a half a mile away, we split the group into two. Half go with Gwen, half will come with me.” She felt the lightness of the missing team member, of the person she trusted the most.
Brodie.
That bastard had gotten under her skin, she...fell for him. And now she felt like a fool. Scarlett glanced down at the loaded Glock in her hands, the one Matt had lent her. She wasn’t a crack shot, but she had trained with weapons just like everyone else in the clan. She knew how to use it if she needed it.
“Gwen, are you sure you’re ready for all of this?”
“Gonnae go with a no on that one, Queenie. But I’ll do ma best.” Gwen murmured, looking down at her hands as they spiked to life.
They were going to have to move hard and fast against the guards, breaking their way in before the King had a chance to hide. It was a desperate attempt and they were only hoping Victoria wasn’t there to throw her own rage into the mix.
But with Gwen gone? There was no telling how much more protection Ronan had called upon.
There were murmurs among the group as the last of the plan and outline was discussed, everyone checking their weapons as the SUV headed off towards the castle. They would park away from eyesight before heading off under protection of Scarlett and Gwen’s ward. Then? The break would happen and their hopes would be with the Gods.
Scarlett was on edge, foot tapping impatiently as they got closer and closer to their destination. It would have helped to have more backup but she was working with what she had. They would make do, her team consisted of some of the best fighters the clan had. When the car stopped, she swallowed and forced a tight smile.
“Alright. Let’s do this.” Scarlett opened the door and hopped out.
Instantly, she called on the ward and it came up and around the five fighters she had with her. She sent Matt off with Gwen, knowing she needed him more than Scarlett did. Holding a finger to her lips, she jerked her chin in the direction of the castle.
The two groups moved silently through the wooded area, slowing their pace ever so slightly when they reached the open field around the castle. When they were a hundred yards out, the groups split and Scarlett’s headed toward the front door. If she remembered correctly, Brodie had said things were quiet this time of day, the staff using the time to prep for what needed to be done. But who knew what to believe.
Holding up her hand, she held up three fingers. Two. One. On her signal, she used her magic to blast the front doors in and across the foyer, the back doors doing the same. Glass shattered, wood splintered, and all hell broke loose.
Guards ducked down as the materials soared overhead, distracting them just long enough for Scarlett’s team to get inside. The guards couldn’t see their intruders, the vampires sniffing the air in alarm as they tried to find them.
Two shots knocked the first guards to the ground, a shape coming up behind Scarlett and her team. Brodie had followed the empty space they had left behind, springing into action the moment they had busted into the castle.
Despite taking care of those two, his eyes were still wildly searching for where the ward of people could be, footsteps racing down the hallways towards the commotion.
Scarlett dropped the ward at once, her team spilling down the halls. They were easy to separate from the others, all of them dressed in black tactical gear. Turning to face the area the shots rang out from, she scowled when Brodie’s face came into view. She was torn on turning her back to him, but she watched him drop several guards.
Still not trusting him, she plowed down the hall, heading for the office she knew her uncle would be in. She prayed the magic he stole from her had dulled. Even if it hadn’t, he still wouldn’t be a match for her. Lifting her hands, she watched the door knob turn before the slab of wood flew in, her uncle standing behind the desk. “Uncle.” She smiled.
“Scarlett.” His smile was equally as cold, four vampire guards beside him.
With a growl, they lunged towards her, two pulling guns while the others relied on hand-to-hand combat. There was a fist thrown at her, another firing off a round where she stood. All the while, Ronan didn’t move until two of Scarlett’s own group entered. He raced around the side of his desk and towards the back exit at a dead sprint.
Scarlett threw up a ward around herself immediately, blocking the bullets as they flew toward her. Heading further into the office, she squared off in the middle of the group attacking her. With her ward up, there was little she could do to strike back. At least until her teammates entered. “Take care of the guards, I’m going after my uncle.”
She left them behind, darting forward to chase after her uncle and dropping the ward in the process. Her uncle disappearing behind the back door to his office, an escape nestled between two bookshelves.
Brodie had come in behind her, just in time to see Scarlett’s ward fall and her open the door to follow Ronan. He followed close behind, knives at his side. Lunging out, one whizzed past Scarlett’s head, careful to miss her as the blade buried itself in the calf of her uncle. Ronan fell forward with a growl, turning and aiming both hands at them.
Launching Scarlett’s stolen power straight at Scarlett and Brodie.
Scarlett flinched, as the knife flew past her head. She had enough time to suck in a gasp of surprise before she felt the magic erupt from her uncle. Her hands shot up, throwing a wall between the two of them. The power her uncle had thrown at her ricocheted off the wall she created and circled back on him.
With a growl, Scarlett dropped the wall and shot out three balls of her own magic at her uncle. Each one was loaded with power, intent on causing harm if they made contact with him.
Ronan screamed out in anger for his guards, looking every bit a sniveling worm as he was knocked to the ground by a ball of Scarlett’s power. He groaned, trying to get to his feet, one hand lowering to the blood pooling around his leg. “GUARDS! GUARDS!” There was panic there, sheer panic as he clawed at the ground to get away, dragging his leg behind him.
Brodie growled, another knife flying through the air, but this one flew into the neck of a guard making his way down the tunnel behind the door they had entered. There was still a loud commotion in the office, a sign that neither side had failed, yet.
“Kill him!”
 Brodie yelled, running over to the fallen guard and placing one foot on the man’s chest. Using it as leverage, he ripped the knife free and faced the door, protecting her back.
Ronan’s eyes were wild as they fixed on Brodie.
“You...YOU!” Ronan spit, eyes wild and fangs bared as he launched another burst of power towards them, this one weaker, flickering at his fingertips before it was released.
Scarlett struggled to keep the two of them protected with her ward. What her uncle had taken only days ago had exhausted her, causing that flame of magic to flicker entirely too soon. Blocking her and Brodie from his zaps of magic, Scarlett produced the Glock Matt had given her.
She raised her right hand, ward dropping as she fired two shots at her uncle before he had a chance to throw anymore magic toward them. One shot struck his shoulder, the other his neck. Scarlett’s eyes bled black, fangs elongating as she raised the gun.
She pulled the trigger once more, bullet hitting its target in the center of his forehead.
Brodie moved towards her slowly, still paying attention to the door behind them but everything was eerily silent. His eyes were black as they peered over at the destroyed face of his former King. A man he had served and been employed by.
Once she was sure her uncle was dead, she turned to Brodie, the world spinning as she stumbled forward a step. “I guess you weren’t lying.” She mumbled, the edges of her vision darkening.
His hands were on her hips in a matter of seconds, not to pull her close, but to keep her upright. Her power was still pulsing beneath Brodie’s hands but it seemed muted, draining into the air around them.
Behind the two of them, a guard entered the doorway, freezing when he saw the body of Ronan. His eyes were wide as his gun lowered, the man taking several steps back and out of the door.
“T-The
King! The King is dead!” They could hear him yelling, footsteps disappearing deep into the castle in a panic.
Scarlett forced her body to stay upright even as Brodie moved in behind her. Her cold, emotionless eyes were on the guards running from the room. “That’s right boys, say hello to your new Queen.” Her words were barely a whisper as they ran from the room.
The moment they were gone Scarlett’s body sagged against Brodie’s.
Her world went black.

~

Victoria had heard the yelling, the panic as Leon had run from the kitchen and toward the battle. But there was a sinking feeling in her stomach, a realization of what was truly happening.
Slowly and carefully, she lifted herself from her chair nearest the large counter space that took up the back of the kitchen and hosted a multitude of sinks. She abandoned her quest to find a private space before her meeting with the King.
Instead of running towards the attack, instead of trying to find Brodie and Scarlett, the two she was certain were behind it all, Victoria slunk towards the back exit, her breath caught in her throat as she moved slowly past running guards. Guards that paid her no mind.
When the fresh air hit her, Victoria ran.
She had no intention of going back.

Chapter Eighteen



Scarlett stirred, familiar voices around her as her eyes fluttered open. At first, they immediately closed, squeezing tight. The light of the room burned her eyes. “Ah, turn the fucking lights off, Gods.” Her arm flopped over her face, protecting her sensitive eyes from the offending source.
“Brodie?” She murmured, not quite brave enough to open her eyes again. “Where is everyone?” She had no idea she had been down for days.
In her mind, it had been an hour, maybe two. “Gwen? Her family? Matt? Someone needs to call my parents…” She was blindly firing off demands and finally, she forced her eyes open, staring straight up at the ceiling.
She frowned, blinking. “Where the hell am I?”
The face of her father, Jax, filled her vision. He had been the only one in the room while Millie and Julian saw to the others. They had been working tirelessly the past few days while Scarlett healed. Only Brodie was stubborn enough not to go and seek rest elsewhere, instead roaming the hallway outside her room until Matt had mentioned exactly who he was. Julian had hauled the man off and kept him locked away. Brodie had not fought in the slightest. It was only temporary, until they figured out what had really happened and what he was doing there.
Jax’s bright blue eyes were warm, sparkling when they met hers.
“Good to see you awake, sweetheart.” Came his voice, a warm rumble that complimented the comforting waves of magic he often used, one hand resting on her arm. “Move carefully, you’re still getting your power back.”
“Dad? What are you doing here?” Her voice softened, body relaxing even as she sat up. “Is Mom here? Julian?” She was peeking around him, staring at the open door. “Where is Brodie, Dad?” She needed to know, had to.
“Brodie? The vampire who tried to betray you...again?” He inquired, one eyebrow raised.
“No. He didn’t betray me...he saved me. Twice.” Did he abandon her? Did they hurt him? Scarlett’s hand moved to Jax’s, blowing out a content sigh as she took it in hers. His magic always calmed hers when no one else’s did. “How did you get here so fast?”
“It has been several days, Scar. You were really out of it. He...saved you? I guess that explains a few things...” The vampire had been oddly cavalier about being locked up and magically guarded given the circumstances. Jax’s eyes scanned over to the door, stopping when they landed on Millie rounding the corner.
“Several days?” Scarlett sat up straight, panic finally taking over. “Where is he?” She demanded.
Millie strolled into the room, answering her daughter as she entered. “We’re still in the castle. Things are...settling here. Or starting too. We have been taking care of the politics, things are in shambles but we’ll be able to help appoint someone soon and go home.”
“I asked where Brodie is.”
“Down the hallway, we are keeping him here…” Jax responded, giving her a warm smile as he stood and gave Millie some room to see her daughter for the first time since her abduction.
“You’ll see him eventually.” Millie said as she moved to Jax’s side, one arm moving to wrap around his waist.
Scarlett yanked the blanket back, dizziness hitting her at once as she tried to stand.
“Scarlett!” Millie reached for her, helping her lay her back down. “Stop. Stop, you can’t get up. Jax…” She turned to her husband, frown apparent as she sighed. “Please go get the vampire. Please.” Jax nodded, turning to leave the room at a rush.
She glanced back at Scarlett, hand coming up to stroke through her daughter’s hair. “Shh baby, it’s okay. Please don’t get up, you’ll only hurt yourself.”
“I just need to see him, Mom. Need make sure he’s okay.”
It only took a minute for Jax to shout down at Julian to let Brodie free, the light fay male reluctantly opening the door to Brodie’s temporary prison. Cold, crystal blue eyes pinning the man down. “Tread carefully.” Julian hissed, allowing Brodie to walk past him and into the hallway.
“Told ye I was a good guy.” Brodie said over his shoulder, walking slowly towards Jax. He knew who they both were, knew who they all were despite them not being familiar with him.
Julian was hot on his heel, not wanting Brodie to get out of his eyesight. Especially not when it came to their daughter.
“Hey, lass.” Brodie said then, eyes softening when they fell to Scarlett on the bed, making his way over to her despite the heavy presence of Julian and Jax at his back.
“Hey.” She didn’t smile.
Once again, she forced herself to sit up, promptly leaning back into the headboard before she could be rocked by another wave of dizziness. “Mom, Dads...do me a favor and wait out in the hall? Ah...Brodie and I need a minute...a few… alone.”
Millie’s mouth opened, ready to protest, but against her better judgement she got to her feet. She looked at Brodie, then at Scarlett, then back to Brodie. “If you harm a single hair on her head…” The threat wasn’t empty.
She already lost Mason, would not lose her daughter as well. Millie leaned down and kissed Scarlett’s forehead. “Just call if you need us.” She pulled away and headed toward the door.
They were alone, the door closing behind her and leaving the two of them there.
“Gonnae blow me away with some magic, Queen? Or a public spankin’? It’s good to see ye alive...”
 He was using the humor to cover his own question. He wanted to know how she was doing, how she was feeling.
Scarlett let her eyes close for a moment, simply allowing her body to rest. When she opened them again, those brown irises were laced with black. “I should. But I’m not going to. You really weren’t lying when you said it was just to trip him up, were you?” She paused. “Did my parents hurt you? They treat you okay?”
“I was no’ lyin. Just guilty of no’ tellin ya. They were fine.” Compared to the other situations he had been in? Her parents were peaches.
He approached her then, clearly content with the knowledge she wasn’t going to lash out and start up something with those light-up hands of hers. His eyes watched her, careful not to give anything away as he knelt down by her bed. One ringed hand reaching out and grabbing hers.
“What are ye gonnae do, Scar? About all this?”
Scarlett give his hand a gentle tug. “Come sit with me. I won’t hurt you, won’t use my magic against you. I’m sorry...shouldn’t have done that.” But she had been furious, didn’t want him anywhere near her.
He raised an eyebrow but kept his mouth shut, moving up onto her bed, one leg crossed in front of him as he leaned towards her.
“I think I’m going to stay here. Run things until everything is settled around here and I can find someone I truly trust to take over my family’s throne…” Was there anyone she truly trusted to take the throne?
No, not really.
“Or maybe you’ll be stuck with me for the rest of your natural born life…”
He laughed then, the sound rich and low. Almost as if all his relief were washed out with that single sound.
“Ye act like that’s such a terrible thing, lass. So be it. Looks like ye will need a calm head to keep ye in check. I’ll warn ye...I cost a lot and request certain...perks.”
She was his Queen and yet the words fell off his tongue.
“You? You’ll be my calm head? Something tells me that won’t be the case. How much are we talking and what are these...perks...you speak of?” She smirked, knowing full and well but wanting to make him speak the words out loud.
“We can discuss price later.” He growled then, and dipped down towards her lips, unable to stop himself as he kissed her, one hand moving to entangle lightly in her hair.
Using that moment to convince himself that she was okay and alive. There in his hands. Something he didn’t think would have affected or worried him so much.
But that was how far Scarlett had wedged herself under his skin.
“Aye...perks.” He murmured against her lips.
Scarlett laughed against the kiss before she returned it. “We can hash out the terms of that agreement later. Until then, can you grab my parents? I want to tell them I’m staying…”
He laughed then, pulling away with a smile. “Good luck with that.” But he stood, making his way over to the door and opening it. Thankfully, Millie, Jax, and Julian were not far away, lingering in the hallway just a few feet from the door.
He didn't have to say anything before Jax led the way inside, Julian and Millie not far behind. Julian’s arms were crossed at his broad chest, crystal eyes sizing Brodie up as they entered the room once more.
“Dad...enough. Brodie didn’t hurt me. Stop staring at him like that.” Looking past Julian, her gaze fell on Millie, a tight smile forming.
“Mom...I’m staying in Scotland. I’m...going to take my rightful spot on the throne. This...this is my home now.”
Jax’s lips were tight, giving her the softest of nods. He didn’t say anything, glancing over to Millie. He understood, in a way. He had never felt like home was where he was born, only in the area of his choosing. Julian was quite the same. In a way, they both understood her choice, despite it meaning she was leaving her family.
Julian spoke, “But you don’t know how this royalty stuff works...there’s so...much...shit to learn.” He seemed to be scrambling for the words, seeming at a loss. “We should...stay a little bit and help.” Or a long bit, hell, he had not seen this coming despite the few conversations the three parents had over the possibility.
“I don’t have to know how it works, I’ll learn in time. I have you, Dad. And Brodie. Things need to change here before another Ronan comes along. I can do this… I’m staying. You guys can stay for as long as you’d like...but you cannot treat me like I’m a little girl anymore.”
Millie spoke up then, swallowing down her emotions. “Is this really what you want? Truly?”
“Yes. My...people...they need me.”
Millie nodded. “Okay. Okay then…” She blew out a sigh, hand coming up to run through her hair. “You’ll need to have a wing set up for the family...you know Jake and Callie will be on the next flight here when they find out you’re not coming back.” There was a hint of a smile there.
Jax let out a breath of air, his eyes falling over to Brodie, then. “You’re going to help her?” There was an air of suspicion there.
Brodie nodded, dark eyes on Scarlett and Scarlett alone. Something there, a brimming emotion that could not be placed.

“Aye, for as long as she’ll have me.”
About the Authors
Jodie
Jodie graduated from a small New England college with a Bachelor of Science in Criminal Justice. She is a member of the Who’s Who’s Society and Alpha Phi Sigma and was a recipient of the Ellen Bree Burns Award in 2016. After college, she pursued a career in emergency medical services; however, a shoulder injury left her unable to continue her work in first response. In search of an outlet, she turned to writing. That fun hobby quickly turned into something more serious than a few short stories. Since then, she has taken part in both the blogging and novel writing communities. Jodie currently lives in the United States with her German Shepherd, and her horse. Fully embracing the adventures in her head, Jodie continues to write with her co-author, Rose.

Rose
I am Rose, confidante, messenger, and writer for the supernatural. As soon as these tales came to my partner and myself, we knew they must be told. It wasn’t a matter of if, but a matter of when. Pouring over pages to share the adventures of these characters is what I am meant to do. I’m someone fueled by coffee and the love of my husband and dog. A lifelong writer that dedicates my time to hobbies, new endeavors, and education. With a Bachelors in Marriage and Family Counseling and a desire to assist others through writing, I can’t wait to tell you these tales from a different perspective.

Other books by this Author
Please visit your favorite ebook retailer to discover other books by Jodie Rose.

Keepers of the City 
Soul Fire – Book one
Soul Rekindled – Book two
Soul Reborn – Book three

Shortstories
Spellbound
Seeking Souls
Blood Born

Demons of the City
Dark Bonds
Dark Desires
Dark Surrender -coming 2019!
Connect with Jodie Rose



Dear fans, thank you for taking the time to read our work! Want to know how to reach out to us? See the links below to find out social media pages!

Like us on Facebook: https://www.facebook.com/Jodieroseauthor/
Follow us on Twitter: https://twitter.com/Jodieroseauthor (@jodieroseauthor)
Visit the website: jodieroseauthor.wordpress.com
Email: jodieroseauthor@gmail.com

